1676 | sit (verb): to be seated | loc: oturmak
  EN TS: Sitting with a coffee? Vibes.
  tr TS: Kahveyle oturmak mı? Tam vibe.
  EN FS: Sitting with a book? Vibes.
  tr FS: Kitapla oturmak mı? Tam vibe.
  EN TP: sitting in an armchair
  tr TP: koltukta oturmak
  EN FP: sitting at a desk
  tr FP: çalışma masasında oturmak
1677 | city (noun): a large crowded area of streets and buildings | loc: şehir
  EN TS: They are not looking at the city.
  tr TS: Şehre bakmıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are not looking at their phones.
  tr FS: Telefonlarına bakmıyorlar.
  EN TP: a city at dusk
  tr TP: alacakaranlıkta bir şehir
  EN FP: a city at noon
  tr FP: öğle vakti bir şehir
1679 | temple (noun): a building where people pray | loc: tapınak
  EN TS: The temple is golden.
  tr TS: Tapınak altın rengi.
  EN FS: The temple is silver.
  tr FS: Tapınak gümüş rengi.
  EN TP: a temple by a pond
  tr TP: gölet kenarında bir tapınak
  EN FP: a temple in a city
  tr FP: şehirde bir tapınak
1681 | peacock (noun): a large bird with a long shiny blue-green tail | loc: tavus kuşu
  EN TS: What a long tail, peacock!
  tr TS: Ne uzun kuyruk, tavus kuşu!
  EN FS: What a short tail, peacock!
  tr FS: Ne kısa kuyruk, tavus kuşu!
  EN TP: a peacock on a branch
  tr TP: dalda bir tavus kuşu
  EN FP: a peacock on the ground
  tr FP: yerde bir tavus kuşu
1684 | mask (noun): a cover you wear over your face | loc: maske
  EN TS: Even the Mona Lisa wears a mask now.
  tr TS: Mona Lisa bile artık maske takıyor.
  EN FS: Even the Mona Lisa wears a hat now.
  tr FS: Mona Lisa bile artık şapka takıyor.
  EN TP: a white medical mask
  tr TP: beyaz bir tıbbi maske
  EN FP: a mask for a party
  tr FP: bir parti maskesi
1685 | crowd (noun): a large group of people packed together | loc: kalabalık
  EN TS: The crowd is running away!
  tr TS: Kalabalık kaçıyor!
  EN FS: The crowd is running inside!
  tr FS: Kalabalık içeri koşuyor!
  EN TP: a crowd fleeing the temple
  tr TP: tapınaktan kaçan kalabalık
  EN FP: a crowd praying inside
  tr FP: içeride dua eden kalabalık
1686 | charge (verb): to fill a phone or battery with electricity | loc: şarj etmek
  EN TS: He is charging himself.
  tr TS: Kendini şarj ediyor.
  EN FS: He is charging his phone.
  tr FS: Telefonunu şarj ediyor.
  EN TP: charging from a wall socket
  tr TP: prizden şarj etmek
  EN FP: charging a car battery
  tr FP: araba aküsünü şarj etmek
1689 | jesus (noun): the central figure of the Christian faith | loc: İsa
  EN TS: Jesus is standing by a cave.
  tr TS: İsa bir mağaranın yanında duruyor.
  EN FS: Jesus is standing by a lake.
  tr FS: İsa bir gölün yanında duruyor.
  EN TP: Jesus by a cave
  tr TP: mağaranın yanında İsa
  EN FP: Jesus by the sea
  tr FP: deniz kenarında İsa
1693 | knight (noun): a soldier in metal armour from the Middle Ages | loc: şövalye
  EN TS: A knight is swinging a sword.
  tr TS: Bir şövalye kılıç sallıyor.
  EN FS: A knight is swinging an axe.
  tr FS: Bir şövalye balta sallıyor.
  EN TP: a knight in armour
  tr TP: zırhlı bir şövalye
  EN FP: a knight on a horse
  tr FP: atlı bir şövalye
1694 | chief (noun): the leader of a group or tribe | loc: şef
  EN TS: The chief wears a feather.
  tr TS: Şef başına tüy takmış.
  EN FS: The chief wears a crown.
  tr FS: Şef başına taç takmış.
  EN TP: a chief with a feather
  tr TP: tüylü bir kabile şefi
  EN FP: a chief with a crown
  tr FP: taçlı bir kabile şefi
1695 | gun (noun): a weapon that fires a bullet at high speed | loc: silah
  EN TS: She is holding a gun.
  tr TS: Elinde bir silah tutuyor.
  EN FS: She is holding a phone.
  tr FS: Elinde bir telefon tutuyor.
  EN TP: holding a gun down
  tr TP: silahı aşağı doğru tutmak
  EN FP: holding a gun up
  tr FP: silahı yukarı doğru tutmak
1696 | eagle (noun): a large strong bird that hunts | loc: kartal
  EN TS: The eagle manages two chicks.
  tr TS: Kartal iki yavruyu yönetiyor.
  EN FS: The eagle manages four chicks.
  tr FS: Kartal dört yavruyu yönetiyor.
  EN TP: an eagle above its nest
  tr TP: yuvasının üstünde bir kartal
  EN FP: an eagle catching a fish
  tr FP: balık yakalayan bir kartal
1697 | fan (noun): a folding object you wave to move air | loc: yelpaze
  EN TS: Fan and kimono: very elegant.
  tr TS: Yelpaze ve kimono: çok zarif.
  EN FS: Book and kimono: very elegant.
  tr FS: Kitap ve kimono: çok zarif.
  EN TP: an open folding fan
  tr TP: açık bir yelpaze
  EN FP: an electric fan in summer
  tr FP: yazın elektrikli vantilatör
1699 | swim (verb): to move through water with your body | loc: yüzmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Someone is swimming to the music.
  tr TS: Biri müzik eşliğinde yüzüyor.
  EN FS: Someone is flying to the music.
  tr FS: Biri müzik eşliğinde uçuyor.
  EN TP: swimming across calm water
  tr TP: sakin suda yüzmek
  EN FP: swimming in a pool
  tr FP: havuzda yüzmek
1701 | lily (noun): a tall plant with big trumpet-shaped flowers | loc: zambak
  EN TS: A lily is growing from a jug.
  tr TS: Bir sürahiden zambak çıkıyor.
  EN FS: A rose is growing from a jug.
  tr FS: Bir sürahiden gül çıkıyor.
  EN TP: a lily in a jug
  tr TP: sürahide bir zambak
  EN FP: a lily in a pond
  tr FP: gölette bir zambak
1703 | read (verb): to look at written words and understand them | loc: okumak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is reading in the air.
  tr TS: Havada kitap okuyor.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in the air.
  tr FS: Havada uyuyor.
  EN TP: reading a glowing book
  tr TP: parlayan bir kitap okumak
  EN FP: reading a text message
  tr FP: bir mesaj okumak
1704 | christmas (noun): the winter holiday on 25 December | loc: Noel
  EN TS: It says 'happy Christmas'.
  tr TS: Üstünde "Mutlu Noeller" yazıyor.
  EN FS: It says 'happy birthday'.
  tr FS: Üstünde "İyi ki doğdun" yazıyor.
  EN TP: an old Christmas card
  tr TP: eski bir Noel kartı
  EN FP: an old Christmas tree
  tr FP: eski bir Noel ağacı
1706 | sunglasses (noun): dark spectacles that protect the eyes from the sun | loc: güneş gözlüğü
  EN TS: Cool dog, cool sunglasses.
  tr TS: Havalı köpek, havalı güneş gözlüğü.
  EN FS: Cool dog, cool hat.
  tr FS: Havalı köpek, havalı şapka.
  EN TP: a husky in sunglasses
  tr TP: güneş gözlüklü bir husky
  EN FP: sunglasses on a beach towel
  tr FP: plaj havlusunda güneş gözlüğü
1707 | cottage (noun): a small simple house in the countryside | loc: kulübe
  EN TS: Plants are eating the cottage.
  tr TS: Bitkiler kulübeyi yiyor.
  EN FS: Plants are eating the church.
  tr FS: Bitkiler kiliseyi yiyor.
  EN TP: an overgrown stone cottage
  tr TP: sarmaşık basmış taş kulübe
  EN FP: a cottage by the sea
  tr FP: deniz kenarında bir kulübe
1709 | teacher (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: öğretmen
  EN TS: The teacher is explaining.
  tr TS: Öğretmen anlatıyor.
  EN FS: The teacher is sleeping.
  tr FS: Öğretmen uyuyor.
  EN TP: a teacher at the board
  tr TP: tahta başında bir öğretmen
  EN FP: a teacher at her desk
  tr FP: masasında bir öğretmen
1710 | blackboard (noun): a dark wall surface teachers write on in chalk | loc: kara tahta
  EN TS: The blackboard is empty.
  tr TS: Kara tahta boş.
  EN FS: The blackboard is full.
  tr FS: Kara tahta dolu.
  EN TP: an empty blackboard
  tr TP: boş bir kara tahta
  EN FP: a blackboard full of notes
  tr FP: notlarla dolu kara tahta
1711 | skeleton (noun): all the bones of a body together | loc: iskelet | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The skeleton looks very happy.
  tr TS: İskelet çok mutlu görünüyor.
  EN FS: The skeleton looks very sad.
  tr FS: İskelet çok üzgün görünüyor.
  EN TP: a skeleton with a bow
  tr TP: fiyonklu bir iskelet
  EN FP: a skeleton in a museum
  tr FP: müzede bir iskelet
1713 | feather (noun): one of the light soft things covering a bird | loc: tüy
  EN TS: Hundreds of feathers on top.
  tr TS: Tepede yüzlerce tüy.
  EN FS: Hundreds of flowers on top.
  tr FS: Tepede yüzlerce çiçek.
  EN TP: a headdress of long feathers
  tr TP: uzun tüylerden bir başlık
  EN FP: a pillow full of feathers
  tr FP: tüy dolu bir yastık
1716 | spacesuit (noun): the sealed suit an astronaut wears in space | loc: uzay giysisi
  EN TS: The spacesuit is white.
  tr TS: Uzay giysisi beyaz.
  EN FS: The spacesuit is orange.
  tr FS: Uzay giysisi turuncu.
  EN TP: a white spacesuit
  tr TP: beyaz bir uzay giysisi
  EN FP: a spacesuit on a hanger
  tr FP: askıda bir uzay giysisi
1717 | instrument (noun): an object you play to make music | loc: enstrüman
  EN TS: This instrument is a violin.
  tr TS: Bu enstrüman bir keman.
  EN FS: This instrument is a guitar.
  tr FS: Bu enstrüman bir gitar.
  EN TP: a string instrument
  tr TP: telli bir enstrüman
  EN FP: a wind instrument
  tr FP: üflemeli bir enstrüman
1718 | calm (adjective): quiet, relaxed and not worried at all | loc: sakin
  EN TS: The Buddha is 100 % calm.
  tr TS: Buda yüzde 100 sakin.
  EN FS: The Buddha is 100 % angry.
  tr FS: Buda yüzde 100 kızgın.
  EN TP: a calm face
  tr TP: sakin bir yüz
  EN FP: a calm sea
  tr FP: sakin bir deniz
1724 | hold (verb): to have something in your hands or grip | loc: tutmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is holding the moon!
  tr TS: Ay'ı elinde tutuyor!
  EN FS: She is holding the sun!
  tr FS: Güneş'i elinde tutuyor!
  EN TP: holding the moon
  tr TP: Ay'ı tutmak
  EN FP: holding a poppy
  tr FP: bir gelincik tutmak
1725 | cross (noun): two crossed beams used to crucify someone | loc: haç
  EN TS: A cross lies on the ground.
  tr TS: Yerde bir haç yatıyor.
  EN FS: A ladder lies on the ground.
  tr FS: Yerde bir merdiven yatıyor.
  EN TP: a cross on the ground
  tr TP: yerde bir haç
  EN FP: a cross on a church
  tr FP: kilisede bir haç
1726 | cape (noun): a loose sleeveless coat hanging from the shoulders | loc: pelerin
  EN TS: She is swirling a red cape.
  tr TS: Kırmızı bir pelerin savuruyor.
  EN FS: She is swirling a red scarf.
  tr FS: Kırmızı bir eşarp savuruyor.
  EN TP: swirling a red cape
  tr TP: kırmızı pelerin savurmak
  EN FP: wearing a cape and mask
  tr FP: pelerin ve maske takmak
1728 | fan (noun): a folding object you wave to move air | loc: yelpaze
  EN TS: Red fan up, leg up!
  tr TS: Kırmızı yelpaze havada, bacak havada!
  EN FS: Red hat up, leg up!
  tr FS: Kırmızı şapka havada, bacak havada!
  EN TP: waving a red fan
  tr TP: kırmızı yelpaze sallamak
  EN FP: a fan on the ceiling
  tr FP: tavanda bir vantilatör
1729 | pet (noun): an animal kept at home for company | loc: evcil hayvan
  EN TS: She has two pets.
  tr TS: İki evcil hayvanı var.
  EN FS: She has three pets.
  tr FS: Üç evcil hayvanı var.
  EN TP: a girl with her pets
  tr TP: evcil hayvanlarıyla bir kız
  EN FP: a girl buying a pet
  tr FP: evcil hayvan alan bir kız
1731 | arrow (noun): the thin feathered stick you shoot from a bow | loc: ok
  EN TS: An arrow hit her flag!
  tr TS: Bir ok bayrağını vurdu!
  EN FS: An arrow hit her horse!
  tr FS: Bir ok atını vurdu!
  EN TP: arrows in a flag
  tr TP: bayrağa saplanmış oklar
  EN FP: arrows in a target
  tr FP: hedefe saplanmış oklar
1733 | elf (noun): a magical creature with pointed ears | loc: elf
  EN TS: Guess what the elf is holding? A light.
  tr TS: Bil bakalım elf ne tutuyor? Bir ışık.
  EN FS: Guess what the elf is holding? A sword.
  tr FS: Bil bakalım elf ne tutuyor? Bir kılıç.
  EN TP: an elf with pointed ears
  tr TP: sivri kulaklı bir elf
  EN FP: an elf with a bow
  tr FP: yay taşıyan bir elf
1734 | superhero (noun): a caped character with special powers | loc: süper kahraman
  EN TS: This superhero is Spider-Man.
  tr TS: Bu süper kahraman Örümcek Adam.
  EN FS: This superhero is Batman.
  tr FS: Bu süper kahraman Batman.
  EN TP: a superhero in a mask
  tr TP: maskeli bir süper kahraman
  EN FP: a superhero with a cape
  tr FP: pelerinli bir süper kahraman
1738 | veil (noun): a piece of cloth that covers the head | loc: peçe
  EN TS: She wears a long dark veil.
  tr TS: Uzun, koyu renk bir peçe takıyor.
  EN FS: She wears a long white veil.
  tr FS: Uzun, beyaz bir peçe takıyor.
  EN TP: a long dark veil
  tr TP: uzun, koyu renk bir peçe
  EN FP: a wedding veil
  tr FP: bir gelin duvağı
1741 | emperor (noun): the man who rules a whole empire | loc: imparator | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The emperor wears a wreath.
  tr TS: İmparatorun başında defne çelengi var.
  EN FS: The emperor wears a crown.
  tr FS: İmparatorun başında taç var.
  EN TP: an emperor with a wreath
  tr TP: defne çelenkli bir imparator
  EN FP: an emperor on a horse
  tr FP: at üstünde bir imparator
1742 | shield (noun): a flat piece of armour held for protection | loc: kalkan
  EN TS: The angel is holding a shield.
  tr TS: Melek bir kalkan tutuyor.
  EN FS: The angel is holding a sword.
  tr FS: Melek bir kılıç tutuyor.
  EN TP: a large round shield
  tr TP: büyük, yuvarlak bir kalkan
  EN FP: a shield on the ground
  tr FP: yerde bir kalkan
1743 | italy (noun): a country in southern Europe, home of pizza | loc: İtalya
  EN TS: Ice cream in Italy? Of course.
  tr TS: İtalya'da dondurma mı? Tabii ki.
  EN FS: Pizza in Italy? Of course.
  tr FS: İtalya'da pizza mı? Tabii ki.
  EN TP: a leaning tower in Italy
  tr TP: İtalya'da eğik bir kule
  EN FP: a pizza oven in Italy
  tr FP: İtalya'da bir pizza fırını
1747 | tent (noun): a shelter of cloth stretched over poles | loc: çadır
  EN TS: Best tent spot ever!
  tr TS: Efsane çadır yeri!
  EN FS: Best beach spot ever!
  tr FS: Efsane plaj yeri!
  EN TP: a tent on a hill
  tr TP: tepede bir çadır
  EN FP: a tent on a beach
  tr FP: kumsalda bir çadır
1751 | sign (noun): a big board that shows advertisements | loc: tabela
  EN TS: Each sign shows a landscape.
  tr TS: Her tabelada bir manzara var.
  EN FS: Each sign shows a city.
  tr FS: Her tabelada bir şehir var.
  EN TP: arrow signs with landscapes
  tr TP: manzaralı ok tabelalar
  EN FP: arrow signs with prices
  tr FP: fiyatlı ok tabelalar
1752 | windmill (noun): a building with big sails turned by the wind | loc: yel değirmeni
  EN TS: The windmill windows are lit.
  tr TS: Yel değirmeninin pencerelerinde ışık yanıyor.
  EN FS: The windmill windows are open.
  tr FS: Yel değirmeninin pencereleri açık.
  EN TP: a windmill by a lake
  tr TP: göl kenarında bir yel değirmeni
  EN FP: a windmill in a field
  tr FP: tarlada bir yel değirmeni
1756 | argue (verb): to speak angrily with someone you disagree with | loc: tartışmak
  EN TS: They are arguing on the phone.
  tr TS: Telefonda tartışıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are singing on the phone.
  tr FS: Telefonda şarkı söylüyorlar.
  EN TP: arguing on the phone
  tr TP: telefonda tartışmak
  EN FP: arguing in the kitchen
  tr FP: mutfakta tartışmak
1757 | blossom (noun): a flower on a tree, like cherry blossom | loc: çiçek
  EN TS: Music under the blossoms? Romantic.
  tr TS: Çiçeklerin altında müzik mi? Romantik.
  EN FS: Dancing under the blossoms? Romantic.
  tr FS: Çiçeklerin altında dans mı? Romantik.
  EN TP: pink cherry blossoms
  tr TP: pembe kiraz çiçekleri
  EN FP: cherry blossom tea
  tr FP: kiraz çiçeği çayı
1762 | whale (noun): a huge sea animal that breathes air | loc: balina
  EN TS: A man is falling into a whale!
  tr TS: Bir adam balinanın içine düşüyor!
  EN FS: A man is falling into a boat!
  tr FS: Bir adam teknenin içine düşüyor!
  EN TP: the mouth of a whale
  tr TP: bir balinanın ağzı
  EN FP: a whale in an aquarium
  tr FP: akvaryumda bir balina
1765 | greedy (adjective): wanting far more money than you need | loc: açgözlü
  EN TS: So greedy! Hands off the gold!
  tr TS: Ne açgözlü! Çek elini altından!
  EN FS: So greedy! Hands off the cake!
  tr FS: Ne açgözlü! Çek elini pastadan!
  EN TP: a greedy man with coins
  tr TP: paralarıyla açgözlü bir adam
  EN FP: a greedy dog with food
  tr FP: mamasıyla açgözlü bir köpek
1766 | blackberry (noun): a dark fruit made of many little parts | loc: böğürtlen
  EN TS: Black and red blackberries.
  tr TS: Siyah ve kırmızı böğürtlenler.
  EN FS: Black and green blackberries.
  tr FS: Siyah ve yeşil böğürtlenler.
  EN TP: ripe blackberries on a branch
  tr TP: dalda olgun böğürtlenler
  EN FP: blackberries in a pie
  tr FP: turtada böğürtlenler
1777 | banjo (noun): a round-bodied string instrument | loc: banço
  EN TS: This dude is playing the banjo.
  tr TS: Bu kanka banço çalıyor.
  EN FS: This dude is playing the drums.
  tr FS: Bu kanka davul çalıyor.
  EN TP: playing a banjo
  tr TP: banço çalmak
  EN FP: tuning a banjo
  tr FP: banço akort etmek
1779 | chain (noun): a row of metal rings joined together | loc: zincir
  EN TS: His chain is out of control!
  tr TS: Zinciri kontrolden çıktı!
  EN FS: His rope is out of control!
  tr FS: İpi kontrolden çıktı!
  EN TP: a chain whipping around him
  tr TP: etrafında savrulan bir zincir
  EN FP: a chain around his neck
  tr FP: boynunda bir zincir
1780 | bike (noun): a vehicle with two wheels that you pedal | loc: bisiklet
  EN TS: A dog is chasing his bike!
  tr TS: Bir köpek bisikletini kovalıyor!
  EN FS: A cat is chasing his bike!
  tr FS: Bir kedi bisikletini kovalıyor!
  EN TP: a bike ride downhill
  tr TP: yokuş aşağı bisiklet turu
  EN FP: a bike ride uphill
  tr FP: yokuş yukarı bisiklet turu
1781 | halloween (noun): the autumn night of scary costumes and pumpkins | loc: Cadılar Bayramı
  EN TS: Halloween every day in this house.
  tr TS: Bu evde her gün Cadılar Bayramı.
  EN FS: Halloween every day in this castle.
  tr FS: Bu şatoda her gün Cadılar Bayramı.
  EN TP: a Halloween haunted house
  tr TP: Cadılar Bayramı perili evi
  EN FP: a Halloween party at school
  tr FP: okulda Cadılar Bayramı partisi
1783 | child (noun): a young person, a boy or a girl | loc: çocuk
  EN TS: Four children, one lap, a hug for each child.
  tr TS: Dört çocuk, bir kucak, her çocuğa bir sarılma.
  EN FS: Four children, one lap, a gift for each child.
  tr FS: Dört çocuk, bir kucak, her çocuğa bir hediye.
  EN TP: a man hugging each child
  tr TP: her çocuğa sarılan bir adam
  EN FP: a man teaching each child
  tr FP: her çocuğa ders veren bir adam
1785 | beautiful (adjective): delighting the senses, very nice to look at | loc: güzel
  EN TS: This is a beautiful drawing.
  tr TS: Bu güzel bir çizim.
  EN FS: This is a beautiful photo.
  tr FS: Bu güzel bir fotoğraf.
  EN TP: a beautiful portrait
  tr TP: güzel bir portre
  EN FP: a beautiful sunset
  tr FP: güzel bir gün batımı
1786 | meteor (noun): a space rock that burns as it falls | loc: göktaşı
  EN TS: Meteors are falling like rain.
  tr TS: Göktaşları yağmur gibi yağıyor.
  EN FS: Leaves are falling like rain.
  tr FS: Yapraklar yağmur gibi yağıyor.
  EN TP: meteors raining down
  tr TP: yağmur gibi yağan göktaşları
  EN FP: a meteor in a museum
  tr FP: müzede bir göktaşı
1787 | streetlight (noun): a tall lamp that lights a street at night | loc: sokak lambası
  EN TS: Red scarf under a streetlight. Stylish.
  tr TS: Sokak lambasının altında kırmızı atkı. Tarz.
  EN FS: Blue scarf under a streetlight. Stylish.
  tr FS: Sokak lambasının altında mavi atkı. Tarz.
  EN TP: a glowing streetlight
  tr TP: yanan bir sokak lambası
  EN FP: a broken streetlight
  tr FP: bozuk bir sokak lambası
1788 | monster (noun): a frightening creature that is not real | loc: canavar
  EN TS: A sea monster with passengers!
  tr TS: Yolcu taşıyan bir deniz canavarı!
  EN FS: A sea turtle with passengers!
  tr FS: Yolcu taşıyan bir deniz kaplumbağası!
  EN TP: a sea monster rising
  tr TP: yükselen bir deniz canavarı
  EN FP: a monster under the bed
  tr FP: yatağın altında bir canavar
1792 | build (verb): to make something by combining parts | loc: inşa etmek
  EN TS: They are building a tower.
  tr TS: Bir kule inşa ediyorlar.
  EN FS: They are building a ship.
  tr FS: Bir gemi inşa ediyorlar.
  EN TP: to build a huge tower
  tr TP: dev bir kule inşa etmek
  EN FP: to build a small house
  tr FP: küçük bir ev inşa etmek
1794 | feather (noun): one of the light soft things covering a bird | loc: tüy
  EN TS: So many peacock feathers!
  tr TS: Ne kadar çok tavus kuşu tüyü!
  EN FS: So many swan feathers!
  tr FS: Ne kadar çok kuğu tüyü!
  EN TP: shimmering peacock feathers
  tr TP: parıldayan tavus kuşu tüyleri
  EN FP: a feather in a pillow
  tr FP: yastıkta bir tüy
1799 | cello (noun): a large string instrument played sitting down | loc: çello
  EN TS: The cello is the largest one.
  tr TS: En büyükleri çello.
  EN FS: The violin is the largest one.
  tr FS: En büyükleri keman.
  EN TP: a large dark cello
  tr TP: büyük, koyu renk bir çello
  EN FP: a small dark cello
  tr FP: küçük, koyu renk bir çello
1800 | hide (verb): to keep yourself or something from being seen | loc: saklanmak | checker: word_missing? | translator note: hiding a smile needs transitive saklamak, not reflexive saklanmak; phrases keep saklanmak
  EN TS: They are hiding a smile.
  tr TS: Gülümsemelerini saklıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are hiding a phone.
  tr FS: Telefonlarını saklıyorlar.
  EN TP: hiding behind a book
  tr TP: kitabın arkasına saklanmak
  EN FP: hiding under a table
  tr FP: masanın altına saklanmak
1802 | note (noun): a sign for a single sound in written music | loc: nota
  EN TS: Notes are pouring out of the guitar!
  tr TS: Gitardan notalar fışkırıyor!
  EN FS: Coins are pouring out of the guitar!
  tr FS: Gitardan paralar fışkırıyor!
  EN TP: a waterfall of notes
  tr TP: bir nota şelalesi
  EN FP: a stack of notes
  tr FP: bir deste not kâğıdı
1803 | throw (verb): to send something through the air | loc: atmak
  EN TS: He is going to throw the ball.
  tr TS: Topu atmak üzere.
  EN FS: He is going to kick the ball.
  tr FS: Topu tekmelemek üzere.
  EN TP: about to throw the ball
  tr TP: topu atmak üzere
  EN FP: to throw a party
  tr FP: çöpü atmak
1806 | bun (noun): hair twisted into a round knot on the head | loc: topuz
  EN TS: Two buns? She is so trendy.
  tr TS: İki topuz mu? Çok trend.
  EN FS: Two bows? She is so trendy.
  tr FS: İki fiyonk mu? Çok trend.
  EN TP: hair in two round buns
  tr TP: iki yuvarlak topuz
  EN FP: two buns on a plate
  tr FP: tabakta iki çörek
1807 | skull (noun): the bones that form the head | loc: kafatası
  EN TS: Skulls are floating around her.
  tr TS: Etrafında kafatasları uçuşuyor.
  EN FS: Hearts are floating around her.
  tr FS: Etrafında kalpler uçuşuyor.
  EN TP: skulls in pink flames
  tr TP: pembe alevler içinde kafatasları
  EN FP: skulls on a pirate flag
  tr FP: korsan bayrağında kafatasları
1808 | headset (noun): a device worn on the head over eyes or ears | loc: başlık
  EN TS: His headset is huge, bro.
  tr TS: Başlığı kocaman, kanka.
  EN FS: His hat is huge, bro.
  tr FS: Şapkası kocaman, kanka.
  EN TP: a chunky headset
  tr TP: iri bir başlık
  EN FP: a headset on a pilot
  tr FP: bir pilotun kulaklığı
1811 | raincoat (noun): a waterproof coat you wear in the rain | loc: yağmurluk
  EN TS: The raincoat is doing its job.
  tr TS: Yağmurluk işini yapıyor.
  EN FS: The umbrella is doing its job.
  tr FS: Şemsiye işini yapıyor.
  EN TP: a long yellow raincoat
  tr TP: uzun sarı bir yağmurluk
  EN FP: a raincoat on a hook
  tr FP: askıda bir yağmurluk
1812 | look (verb): to turn your eyes toward something | loc: bakmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The cat is looking out too.
  tr TS: Kedi de dışarı bakıyor.
  EN FS: The dog is looking out too.
  tr FS: Köpek de dışarı bakıyor.
  EN TP: looking out of the window
  tr TP: pencereden dışarı bakmak
  EN FP: to look after a cat
  tr FP: kediye bakmak
1823 | lonely (adjective): sad because you are all alone | loc: yalnız
  EN TS: She feels lonely tonight.
  tr TS: Bu gece kendini yalnız hissediyor.
  EN FS: She feels lonely this morning.
  tr FS: Bu sabah kendini yalnız hissediyor.
  EN TP: lonely on a balcony
  tr TP: balkonda yalnız
  EN FP: lonely in a crowd
  tr FP: kalabalıkta yalnız
1827 | math (noun): the study of numbers and shapes | loc: matematik
  EN TS: The cat hates math.
  tr TS: Kedi matematikten nefret ediyor.
  EN FS: The dog hates math.
  tr FS: Köpek matematikten nefret ediyor.
  EN TP: walls covered in math
  tr TP: matematikle dolu duvarlar
  EN FP: math books on the floor
  tr FP: yerde matematik kitapları
1831 | light bulb (noun): a glass ball in a lamp that glows when switched on | loc: ampul
  EN TS: A cabin is in the light bulb.
  tr TS: Ampulün içinde bir kulübe var.
  EN FS: A cabin is in the teacup.
  tr FS: Çay fincanının içinde bir kulübe var.
  EN TP: a snowy light bulb
  tr TP: karlı bir ampul
  EN FP: a broken light bulb
  tr FP: kırık bir ampul
1832 | take a photo (phrase): to make a picture with a camera or phone | loc: fotoğraf çekmek
  EN TS: She is taking a photo. Cool!
  tr TS: Fotoğraf çekiyor. Süper!
  EN FS: She is making a call. Cool!
  tr FS: Telefonla konuşuyor. Süper!
  EN TP: taking a photo at night
  tr TP: gece fotoğraf çekmek
  EN FP: taking a photo indoors
  tr FP: içeride fotoğraf çekmek
1833 | lean (verb): to rest your body sideways on something | loc: yaslanmak
  EN TS: He is leaning on his guitar.
  tr TS: Gitarına yaslanıyor.
  EN FS: He is leaning on his piano.
  tr FS: Piyanosuna yaslanıyor.
  EN TP: leaning on a guitar
  tr TP: gitara yaslanmak
  EN FP: leaning on a tree
  tr FP: ağaca yaslanmak
1834 | teach (verb): to help someone learn a skill or subject | loc: öğretmek
  EN TS: A god is teaching a warrior.
  tr TS: Bir tanrı bir savaşçıya bir şeyler öğretiyor.
  EN FS: A god is teaching a child.
  tr FS: Bir tanrı bir çocuğa bir şeyler öğretiyor.
  EN TP: teaching a warrior
  tr TP: bir savaşçıya öğretmek
  EN FP: teaching a crowd
  tr FP: bir kalabalığa öğretmek
1840 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: makine
  EN TS: A giant machine made of gears!
  tr TS: Dişlilerden yapılmış dev bir makine!
  EN FS: A giant machine made of wood!
  tr FS: Tahtadan yapılmış dev bir makine!
  EN TP: a machine of rusty gears
  tr TP: paslı dişlilerden bir makine
  EN FP: a coffee machine
  tr FP: bir kahve makinesi
1843 | neighborhood (noun): the streets and houses around your home | loc: mahalle
  EN TS: A snowy neighborhood at night.
  tr TS: Gece karlı bir mahalle.
  EN FS: A snowy neighborhood at noon.
  tr FS: Öğlen karlı bir mahalle.
  EN TP: a snowy neighborhood
  tr TP: karlı bir mahalle
  EN FP: a neighborhood party
  tr FP: bir mahalle partisi
1846 | crane (noun): a large white bird with a long neck and legs | loc: turna
  EN TS: A crane is flying by the sun.
  tr TS: Bir turna güneşin yanında uçuyor.
  EN FS: A crane is flying by the moon.
  tr FS: Bir turna ayın yanında uçuyor.
  EN TP: a flying white crane
  tr TP: uçan beyaz bir turna
  EN FP: a crane lifting boxes
  tr FP: kutu kaldıran bir vinç
1847 | christmas tree (noun): a pine decorated with lights for the holidays | loc: Noel ağacı
  EN TS: I count three Christmas trees.
  tr TS: Üç Noel ağacı sayıyorum.
  EN FS: I count five Christmas trees.
  tr FS: Beş Noel ağacı sayıyorum.
  EN TP: three little Christmas trees
  tr TP: üç küçük Noel ağacı
  EN FP: a Christmas tree with gifts
  tr FP: hediyeli bir Noel ağacı
1849 | magic (noun): power that makes impossible things happen | loc: sihir
  EN TS: Her magic is glowing!
  tr TS: Sihri parlıyor!
  EN FS: Her hair is glowing!
  tr FS: Saçı parlıyor!
  EN TP: glowing blue magic
  tr TP: parlayan mavi sihir
  EN FP: a magic card trick
  tr FP: sihirli bir kart numarası
1851 | valley (noun): the low land between mountains | loc: vadi
  EN TS: Mist swallows the valleys.
  tr TS: Sis vadileri yutuyor.
  EN FS: Snow swallows the valleys.
  tr FS: Kar vadileri yutuyor.
  EN TP: mist in the valley
  tr TP: vadide sis
  EN FP: a valley full of houses
  tr FP: evlerle dolu bir vadi
1853 | dragon (noun): a huge scaly beast from old stories | loc: ejderha
  EN TS: The dragon is breathing fire.
  tr TS: Ejderha ateş püskürüyor.
  EN FS: The dragon is breathing ice.
  tr FS: Ejderha buz püskürüyor.
  EN TP: a small white dragon
  tr TP: küçük beyaz bir ejderha
  EN FP: a big green dragon
  tr FP: büyük yeşil bir ejderha
1854 | string (noun): one of the thin wires you pluck on a guitar | loc: tel
  EN TS: The guitar has white strings.
  tr TS: Gitarın telleri beyaz.
  EN FS: The guitar has black strings.
  tr FS: Gitarın telleri siyah.
  EN TP: white strings on a guitar
  tr TP: gitarda beyaz teller
  EN FP: white strings on a kite
  tr FP: uçurtmada beyaz ipler
1855 | tail (noun): the part at the back end of an animal's body | loc: kuyruk
  EN TS: The peacock has a huge tail!
  tr TS: Tavus kuşunun kocaman bir kuyruğu var!
  EN FS: The peacock has a short tail!
  tr FS: Tavus kuşunun kısa bir kuyruğu var!
  EN TP: a peacock showing its tail
  tr TP: kuyruğunu açan bir tavus kuşu
  EN FP: a peacock hiding its tail
  tr FP: kuyruğunu saklayan bir tavus kuşu
1856 | tiny (adjective): very, very small | loc: minicik
  EN TS: The figure is tiny. The sky is big.
  tr TS: Figür minicik. Gökyüzü büyük.
  EN FS: The figure is huge. The sky is big.
  tr FS: Figür kocaman. Gökyüzü büyük.
  EN TP: a tiny figure on grass
  tr TP: çimenlerde minicik bir figür
  EN FP: a tiny shelf figure
  tr FP: rafta minicik bir figür
1857 | easter (noun): the spring holiday when Christians remember Jesus | loc: Paskalya
  EN TS: This is an Easter poster.
  tr TS: Bu bir Paskalya afişi.
  EN FS: This is a Christmas poster.
  tr FS: Bu bir Noel afişi.
  EN TP: an Easter poster
  tr TP: bir Paskalya afişi
  EN FP: an Easter egg hunt
  tr FP: Paskalya yumurtası avı
1858 | scarf (noun): a long piece of cloth you wear around your neck | loc: atkı
  EN TS: The child has a long scarf and a big balloon.
  tr TS: Çocuğun uzun bir atkısı ve büyük bir balonu var.
  EN FS: The child has a long sword and a big balloon.
  tr FS: Çocuğun uzun bir kılıcı ve büyük bir balonu var.
  EN TP: a long striped scarf
  tr TP: uzun çizgili bir atkı
  EN FP: a scarf in a drawer
  tr FP: çekmecede bir atkı
1860 | stack (noun): a neat pile of things placed on top of each other | loc: yığın
  EN TS: His head is a stack of books.
  tr TS: Kafası bir kitap yığını.
  EN FS: His head is a stack of plates.
  tr FS: Kafası bir tabak yığını.
  EN TP: a stack of books
  tr TP: bir kitap yığını
  EN FP: a stack of boxes
  tr FP: bir kutu yığını
1861 | antique (adjective): old, valuable and from an earlier time | loc: antika
  EN TS: This antique seat has a swan.
  tr TS: Bu antika koltukta bir kuğu var.
  EN FS: This antique seat has a lion.
  tr FS: Bu antika koltukta bir aslan var.
  EN TP: an antique carved seat
  tr TP: oymalı antika bir koltuk
  EN FP: an antique carved clock
  tr FP: oymalı antika bir saat
1862 | vase (noun): a container you put flowers in | loc: vazo
  EN TS: The vase has pink roses.
  tr TS: Vazoda pembe güller var.
  EN FS: The vase has white roses.
  tr FS: Vazoda beyaz güller var.
  EN TP: a grey classical vase
  tr TP: gri klasik bir vazo
  EN FP: a broken classical vase
  tr FP: kırık klasik bir vazo
1863 | hang (verb): to attach something high up so it drops down | loc: asılı olmak
  EN TS: The swing hangs from the moon!
  tr TS: Salıncak Ay'a asılı!
  EN FS: The swing hangs from a tree!
  tr FS: Salıncak bir ağaca asılı!
  EN TP: hanging from the moon
  tr TP: Ay'a asılı
  EN FP: hanging from a tree
  tr FP: bir ağaca asılı
1865 | fin (noun): the thin part a fish uses to swim | loc: yüzgeç
  EN TS: Those blue fins? Pure fashion.
  tr TS: O mavi yüzgeçler mi? Tam moda.
  EN FS: Those red fins? Pure fashion.
  tr FS: O kırmızı yüzgeçler mi? Tam moda.
  EN TP: big flowing fins
  tr TP: dalgalanan iri yüzgeçler
  EN FP: fins on a diver
  tr FP: bir dalgıcın paletleri
1866 | spy (noun): a person who secretly finds out information | loc: casus
  EN TS: Sunglasses and a gun: a classic spy.
  tr TS: Güneş gözlüğü ve silah: klasik bir casus.
  EN FS: Sunglasses and a knife: a classic spy.
  tr FS: Güneş gözlüğü ve bıçak: klasik bir casus.
  EN TP: a spy with a pistol
  tr TP: tabancalı bir casus
  EN FP: a spy with a camera
  tr FP: fotoğraf makineli bir casus
1868 | justice (noun): fair treatment of people by the law | loc: adalet
  EN TS: Justice needs a lot of heavy books.
  tr TS: Adaletin bir sürü ağır kitaba ihtiyacı var.
  EN FS: Justice needs a lot of candles.
  tr FS: Adaletin bir sürü muma ihtiyacı var.
  EN TP: the scales of justice
  tr TP: adaletin terazisi
  EN FP: the sword of justice
  tr FP: adaletin kılıcı
1870 | hair (noun): the threadlike growth covering the head | loc: saç
  EN TS: Her hair reaches her feet!
  tr TS: Saçı ayaklarına kadar uzanıyor!
  EN FS: Her hair reaches her chin!
  tr FS: Saçı çenesine kadar uzanıyor!
  EN TP: very long dark hair
  tr TP: çok uzun koyu renk saç
  EN FP: a hair in the soup
  tr FP: çorbada bir saç teli
1871 | glow (verb): to shine with a soft light | loc: parıldamak
  EN TS: Her eye is glowing white.
  tr TS: Gözü beyaz parıldıyor.
  EN FS: Her eye is glowing red.
  tr FS: Gözü kırmızı parıldıyor.
  EN TP: an eye glowing white
  tr TP: beyaz parıldayan bir göz
  EN FP: a lamp glowing white
  tr FP: beyaz parıldayan bir lamba
1872 | black (adjective): having the darkest color, like night | loc: siyah
  EN TS: The black cat loves books.
  tr TS: Siyah kedi kitapları seviyor.
  EN FS: The white cat loves books.
  tr FS: Beyaz kedi kitapları seviyor.
  EN TP: a black cat on books
  tr TP: kitapların üstünde siyah bir kedi
  EN FP: a black cat outside
  tr FP: dışarıda siyah bir kedi
1874 | pier (noun): a wooden platform built out over the water | loc: iskele | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are sitting on the pier.
  tr TS: İskelede oturuyorlar.
  EN FS: They are sitting on the boat.
  tr FS: Teknede oturuyorlar.
  EN TP: sitting on a pier
  tr TP: iskelede oturmak
  EN FP: sitting on a bridge
  tr FP: köprüde oturmak
1876 | fishbowl (noun): a round glass bowl where pet fish live | loc: balık fanusu
  EN TS: Cheap helmet: a fishbowl.
  tr TS: Ucuz kask: balık fanusu.
  EN FS: Cheap helmet: a bucket.
  tr FS: Ucuz kask: kova.
  EN TP: a fishbowl on her head
  tr TP: başında bir balık fanusu
  EN FP: a fishbowl on the table
  tr FP: masada bir balık fanusu
1878 | invisible (adjective): impossible to see with your eyes | loc: görünmez
  EN TS: His head is invisible!
  tr TS: Kafası görünmez!
  EN FS: His suit is invisible!
  tr FS: Takımı görünmez!
  EN TP: an invisible head
  tr TP: görünmez bir kafa
  EN FP: an invisible hand
  tr FP: görünmez bir el
1879 | dome (noun): a round roof shaped like half a ball | loc: kubbe
  EN TS: The dome shines like gold.
  tr TS: Kubbe altın gibi parlıyor.
  EN FS: The dome shines like silver.
  tr FS: Kubbe gümüş gibi parlıyor.
  EN TP: a golden dome
  tr TP: altın bir kubbe
  EN FP: a glass dome
  tr FP: cam bir kubbe
1880 | invention (noun): a new machine that someone has created | loc: icat
  EN TS: Best invention ever: a flying ship.
  tr TS: Gelmiş geçmiş en iyi icat: uçan gemi.
  EN FS: Best invention ever: a flying car.
  tr FS: Gelmiş geçmiş en iyi icat: uçan araba.
  EN TP: a flying invention
  tr TP: uçan bir icat
  EN FP: an invention on wheels
  tr FP: tekerlekli bir icat
1881 | meditate (verb): to sit quietly and calm your mind | loc: meditasyon yapmak
  EN TS: She is meditating calmly.
  tr TS: Sakin sakin meditasyon yapıyor.
  EN FS: She is sleeping calmly.
  tr FS: Sakin sakin uyuyor.
  EN TP: meditating in lotus position
  tr TP: lotus pozisyonunda meditasyon yapmak
  EN FP: meditating before an exam
  tr FP: sınavdan önce meditasyon yapmak
1883 | hen (noun): a female chicken | loc: tavuk
  EN TS: The hens are eating outside.
  tr TS: Tavuklar dışarıda yem yiyor.
  EN FS: The hens are eating inside.
  tr FS: Tavuklar içeride yem yiyor.
  EN TP: hens in a farmyard
  tr TP: çiftlik avlusunda tavuklar
  EN FP: hens in a kitchen
  tr FP: mutfakta tavuklar
1884 | reflection (noun): the mirror image seen in water or glass | loc: yansıma
  EN TS: The reflection is upside down.
  tr TS: Yansıma baş aşağı.
  EN FS: The reflection is very blurry.
  tr FS: Yansıma çok bulanık.
  EN TP: a reflection in still water
  tr TP: durgun suda bir yansıma
  EN FP: a reflection in a mirror
  tr FP: aynada bir yansıma
1885 | rich (adjective): having a lot of money and material wealth | loc: zengin
  EN TS: The rich man is on top.
  tr TS: Zengin adam en tepede.
  EN FS: The rich man is at the bottom.
  tr FS: Zengin adam en altta.
  EN TP: a rich man on top
  tr TP: tepede zengin bir adam
  EN FP: a rich man in prison
  tr FP: hapiste zengin bir adam
1886 | consumer (noun): a person who buys and uses goods | loc: tüketici
  EN TS: The consumer's plate is empty.
  tr TS: Tüketicinin tabağı boş.
  EN FS: The consumer's plate is full.
  tr FS: Tüketicinin tabağı dolu.
  EN TP: a hungry consumer
  tr TP: aç bir tüketici
  EN FP: a consumer in a shop
  tr FP: mağazada bir tüketici
1887 | push (verb): to move something with force | loc: itmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is pushing a heavy cart.
  tr TS: Ağır bir el arabasını itiyor.
  EN FS: He is pushing a heavy car.
  tr FS: Ağır bir otomobili itiyor.
  EN TP: pushing an overloaded cart
  tr TP: aşırı yüklü el arabasını itmek
  EN FP: pushing a baby buggy
  tr FP: bebek arabası itmek
1889 | move (verb): to change location, to travel or proceed | loc: hareket etmek
  EN TS: She is moving like lightning!
  tr TS: Şimşek gibi hareket ediyor!
  EN FS: She is sitting like a statue!
  tr FS: Heykel gibi oturuyor!
  EN TP: moving to the music
  tr TP: müzikle hareket etmek
  EN FP: moving to a new flat
  tr FP: yeni bir eve taşınmak
1892 | old (adjective): having lived for a long time | loc: yaşlı
  EN TS: The old man has a thin stick.
  tr TS: Yaşlı adamın ince bir bastonu var.
  EN FS: The old man has an umbrella.
  tr FS: Yaşlı adamın bir şemsiyesi var.
  EN TP: the old man's stick
  tr TP: yaşlı adamın bastonu
  EN FP: the old man's umbrella
  tr FP: yaşlı adamın şemsiyesi
1894 | hedgehog (noun): a small animal covered in sharp spines | loc: kirpi
  EN TS: Sleep well, little hedgehogs.
  tr TS: İyi uykular, minik kirpiler.
  EN FS: Sleep well, little rabbits.
  tr FS: İyi uykular, minik tavşanlar.
  EN TP: a hedgehog family in bed
  tr TP: yatakta bir kirpi ailesi
  EN FP: a hedgehog in a garden
  tr FP: bahçede bir kirpi
1897 | pumpkin (noun): a big round orange vegetable with thick skin | loc: balkabağı
  EN TS: The crow owns these pumpkins.
  tr TS: Bu balkabakları karganın.
  EN FS: The cat owns these pumpkins.
  tr FS: Bu balkabakları kedinin.
  EN TP: three stacked pumpkins
  tr TP: üst üste üç balkabağı
  EN FP: a pumpkin pie
  tr FP: balkabağı turtası
1899 | ruins (noun): the broken remains of old buildings | loc: harabeler
  EN TS: Two giants sit near the ruins.
  tr TS: Harabelerin yanında iki dev oturuyor.
  EN FS: Two lions sit near the ruins.
  tr FS: Harabelerin yanında iki aslan oturuyor.
  EN TP: ruins of old temples
  tr TP: eski tapınak harabeleri
  EN FP: ruins of a castle
  tr FP: şato harabeleri
1905 | curious (adjective): wanting to know what is going on | loc: meraklı
  EN TS: These cats are so curious!
  tr TS: Bu kediler çok meraklı!
  EN FS: These dogs are so curious!
  tr FS: Bu köpekler çok meraklı!
  EN TP: three curious cats
  tr TP: üç meraklı kedi
  EN FP: three sleepy cats
  tr FP: üç uykulu kedi
1906 | blue (adjective): the color between green and violet | loc: mavi
  EN TS: Her hair is blue.
  tr TS: Saçı mavi.
  EN FS: Her hair is red.
  tr FS: Saçı kırmızı.
  EN TP: long blue hair
  tr TP: uzun mavi saç
  EN FP: a blue summer dress
  tr FP: mavi bir yazlık elbise
1908 | heron (noun): a tall water bird with long legs and beak | loc: balıkçıl
  EN TS: Bro, the heron is chilling.
  tr TS: Kanka, balıkçıl kafa dinliyor.
  EN FS: Bro, the swan is chilling.
  tr FS: Kanka, kuğu kafa dinliyor.
  EN TP: a heron on a branch
  tr TP: dalda bir balıkçıl
  EN FP: a heron in the water
  tr FP: suda bir balıkçıl
1909 | blade (noun): the flat cutting part of a knife | loc: bıçak ağzı
  EN TS: Her blade is shining.
  tr TS: Bıçağının ağzı parlıyor.
  EN FS: Her blade is rusty.
  tr FS: Bıçağının ağzı paslı.
  EN TP: a long steel blade
  tr TP: uzun çelik bir bıçak ağzı
  EN FP: a short broken blade
  tr FP: kısa, kırık bir bıçak ağzı
1910 | petal (noun): one of the soft colored parts of a flower | loc: taç yaprağı
  EN TS: She has so many pink petals.
  tr TS: Bir sürü pembe taç yaprağı var.
  EN FS: She has so many pink feathers.
  tr FS: Bir sürü pembe tüyü var.
  EN TP: large pink petals
  tr TP: iri pembe taç yaprakları
  EN FP: petals on the floor
  tr FP: yerde taç yaprakları
1911 | princess (noun): the daughter of a king or queen | loc: prenses
  EN TS: This princess has great style.
  tr TS: Bu prensesin tarzı harika.
  EN FS: This prince has great style.
  tr FS: Bu prensin tarzı harika.
  EN TP: a princess in blue
  tr TP: maviler giymiş bir prenses
  EN FP: a princess in red
  tr FP: kırmızılar giymiş bir prenses
1912 | tattoo (noun): a permanent picture inked into the skin | loc: dövme
  EN TS: Her tattoos are blue.
  tr TS: Dövmeleri mavi.
  EN FS: Her tattoos are red.
  tr FS: Dövmeleri kırmızı.
  EN TP: swirling blue face tattoos
  tr TP: yüzünde mavi kıvrımlı dövmeler
  EN FP: a tattoo on her hand
  tr FP: elinde bir dövme
1914 | piano (noun): a large instrument you play by pressing keys | loc: piyano
  EN TS: The piano is open. Hungry?
  tr TS: Piyano açık. Acıktın mı?
  EN FS: The door is open. Hungry?
  tr FS: Kapı açık. Acıktın mı?
  EN TP: an open grand piano
  tr TP: açık bir kuyruklu piyano
  EN FP: a piano lesson
  tr FP: bir piyano dersi
1915 | bass (noun): the biggest string instrument, deepest sound | loc: kontrbas
  EN TS: The bass has four strings.
  tr TS: Kontrbasın dört teli var.
  EN FS: The bass has six strings.
  tr FS: Kontrbasın altı teli var.
  EN TP: a bass with four strings
  tr TP: dört telli bir kontrbas
  EN FP: a bass with six strings
  tr FP: altı telli bir kontrbas
1916 | ufo (noun): a flying object believed to come from space | loc: UFO
  EN TS: There are UFOs in the sky.
  tr TS: Gökyüzünde UFO'lar var.
  EN FS: There are birds in the sky.
  tr FS: Gökyüzünde kuşlar var.
  EN TP: UFOs in the sky
  tr TP: gökyüzünde UFO'lar
  EN FP: a UFO landing
  tr FP: iniş yapan bir UFO
1917 | speed (noun): how fast something moves, distance per time | loc: hız
  EN TS: A helmet designed for speed.
  tr TS: Hız için tasarlanmış bir kask.
  EN FS: A helmet designed for cycling.
  tr FS: Bisiklet için tasarlanmış bir kask.
  EN TP: a helmet built for speed
  tr TP: hız için yapılmış bir kask
  EN FP: speed on a bicycle
  tr FP: bisiklette hız
1919 | narrow (adjective): not wide, small from side to side | loc: dar
  EN TS: The lane is very narrow.
  tr TS: Sokak çok dar.
  EN FS: The lane is very wide.
  tr FS: Sokak çok geniş.
  EN TP: a narrow cobblestone lane
  tr TP: dar, taş döşeli bir sokak
  EN FP: a narrow escape
  tr FP: kıl payı kurtuluş
1920 | cyborg (noun): a being that is part human, part machine | loc: sayborg
  EN TS: The cyborg has a glowing head.
  tr TS: Sayborgun kafası parlıyor.
  EN FS: The cyborg has a glowing tail.
  tr FS: Sayborgun kuyruğu parlıyor.
  EN TP: a neon city cyborg
  tr TP: neon şehirde bir sayborg
  EN FP: a cyborg in a forest
  tr FP: ormanda bir sayborg
1921 | shocked (adjective): very surprised and upset by something bad | loc: şok olmuş
  EN TS: A shocked face by the water.
  tr TS: Su kenarında şok olmuş bir yüz.
  EN FS: A shocked face in the forest.
  tr FS: Ormanda şok olmuş bir yüz.
  EN TP: a shocked, screaming face
  tr TP: şok olmuş, çığlık atan bir yüz
  EN FP: shocked by the phone bill
  tr FP: telefon faturasına şok olmuş
1922 | study (verb): to learn about a subject by reading | loc: ders çalışmak
  EN TS: Studying gives her a headache.
  tr TS: Ders çalışmak başını ağrıtıyor.
  EN FS: Cooking gives her a headache.
  tr FS: Yemek yapmak başını ağrıtıyor.
  EN TP: studying a huge book
  tr TP: koca bir kitaptan ders çalışmak
  EN FP: studying in the garden
  tr FP: bahçede ders çalışmak
1923 | bookshelf (noun): shelves where books stand side by side | loc: kitaplık
  EN TS: The bookshelves are packed!
  tr TS: Kitaplıklar tıka basa dolu!
  EN FS: The bookshelves are empty!
  tr FS: Kitaplıklar bomboş!
  EN TP: tall bookshelves full of books
  tr TP: kitap dolu uzun kitaplıklar
  EN FP: an empty bookshelf
  tr FP: boş bir kitaplık
1924 | vivid (adjective): very bright and intense in colour | loc: canlı
  EN TS: So many vivid colours!
  tr TS: Ne çok canlı renk!
  EN FS: So many dull colours!
  tr FS: Ne çok soluk renk!
  EN TP: vivid swirls of colour
  tr TP: canlı renk girdapları
  EN FP: a vivid dream
  tr FP: canlı bir rüya
1926 | teeth (noun): the hard white things in your mouth for biting | loc: dişler
  EN TS: The skull has all its teeth!
  tr TS: Kafatasının bütün dişleri yerinde!
  EN FS: The skull has no teeth!
  tr FS: Kafatasının hiç dişi yok!
  EN TP: a skull's grinning teeth
  tr TP: bir kafatasının sırıtan dişleri
  EN FP: a dog's sharp teeth
  tr FP: bir köpeğin sivri dişleri
1927 | roots (noun): the parts of a plant that grow underground | loc: kökler
  EN TS: Golden roots? Not a cheap tree.
  tr TS: Altın kökler mi? Ucuz bir ağaç değil.
  EN FS: Golden leaves? Not a cheap tree.
  tr FS: Altın yapraklar mı? Ucuz bir ağaç değil.
  EN TP: golden roots with jewels
  tr TP: mücevherli altın kökler
  EN FP: golden leaves with jewels
  tr FP: mücevherli altın yapraklar
1928 | downtown (noun): the busy central business area of a city | loc: şehir merkezi
  EN TS: Downtown glows red. So cool.
  tr TS: Şehir merkezi kırmızı parlıyor. Çok havalı.
  EN FS: Downtown glows green. So cool.
  tr FS: Şehir merkezi yeşil parlıyor. Çok havalı.
  EN TP: a neon downtown street
  tr TP: neonlu bir şehir merkezi
  EN FP: a quiet downtown morning
  tr FP: sakin bir şehir merkezi sabahı
1930 | medieval (adjective): from the age of castles and stone towns | loc: ortaçağa ait
  EN TS: The medieval town looks cosy.
  tr TS: Bu ortaçağa ait kasaba çok şirin görünüyor.
  EN FS: The modern city looks cosy.
  tr FS: Bu modern şehir çok şirin görünüyor.
  EN TP: a medieval stone town
  tr TP: ortaçağa ait taş bir kasaba
  EN FP: a medieval market day
  tr FP: bir ortaçağ panayırı
1931 | rainy (adjective): with a lot of water falling from the clouds | loc: yağmurlu
  EN TS: A rainy city street.
  tr TS: Yağmurlu bir şehir sokağı.
  EN FS: A sunny city street.
  tr FS: Güneşli bir şehir sokağı.
  EN TP: a rainy street
  tr TP: yağmurlu bir sokak
  EN FP: a rainy beach
  tr FP: yağmurlu bir plaj
1932 | computer (noun): an electronic machine for work, games and the web | loc: bilgisayar
  EN TS: The computer is on a red desk.
  tr TS: Bilgisayar kırmızı bir masanın üstünde.
  EN FS: The computer is on a red sofa.
  tr FS: Bilgisayar kırmızı bir kanepenin üstünde.
  EN TP: a computer on a desk
  tr TP: masada bir bilgisayar
  EN FP: a computer on a lap
  tr FP: kucakta bir bilgisayar
1933 | spirit (noun): a magical being of nature, not fully human | loc: ruh
  EN TS: She is a tree spirit.
  tr TS: O bir ağaç ruhu.
  EN FS: She is a water spirit.
  tr FS: O bir su ruhu.
  EN TP: an old tree spirit
  tr TP: yaşlı bir ağaç ruhu
  EN FP: a spirit of the ocean
  tr FP: okyanusun ruhu
1934 | surreal (adjective): strange and dream-like, against real rules | loc: gerçeküstü
  EN TS: These shelves are surreal.
  tr TS: Bu raflar gerçeküstü.
  EN FS: These shelves are ordinary.
  tr FS: Bu raflar sıradan.
  EN TP: surreal bending bookshelves
  tr TP: bükülen gerçeküstü kitaplıklar
  EN FP: a surreal melting clock
  tr FP: eriyen gerçeküstü bir saat
1935 | new york (noun): the biggest city in the United States | loc: New York
  EN TS: It is sunset in New York.
  tr TS: New York'ta gün batımı.
  EN FS: It is night in New York.
  tr FS: New York'ta gece.
  EN TP: New York at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında New York
  EN FP: New York at night
  tr FP: gece New York
1936 | flower crown (noun): a ring of blossoms you wear on your head | loc: çiçek tacı
  EN TS: Her flower crown is huge!
  tr TS: Çiçek tacı kocaman!
  EN FS: Her feather crown is huge!
  tr FS: Tüy tacı kocaman!
  EN TP: wearing a flower crown
  tr TP: çiçek tacı takmak
  EN FP: making a flower crown
  tr FP: çiçek tacı yapmak
1937 | hacker (noun): a person who breaks into computers and code | loc: hacker
  EN TS: The hacker is wearing a hood.
  tr TS: Hacker'ın başında kapüşon var.
  EN FS: The hacker is wearing a cap.
  tr FS: Hacker'ın başında kasket var.
  EN TP: a hooded hacker
  tr TP: kapüşonlu bir hacker
  EN FP: a hacker in the park
  tr FP: parkta bir hacker
1938 | coast (noun): the land right along the edge of the sea | loc: kıyı
  EN TS: A lone whale off the coast.
  tr TS: Kıyının açığında yalnız bir balina.
  EN FS: A lone shark off the coast.
  tr FS: Kıyının açığında yalnız bir köpek balığı.
  EN TP: a sandy coast from above
  tr TP: yukarıdan kumlu bir kıyı
  EN FP: a rocky coast with cliffs
  tr FP: falezli, kayalık bir kıyı
1940 | dandelion (noun): a wild yellow flower that turns into a puffball | loc: karahindiba
  EN TS: Dandelions surround her head.
  tr TS: Karahindibalar başını sarıyor.
  EN FS: Roses surround her head.
  tr FS: Güller başını sarıyor.
  EN TP: white dandelion puffs
  tr TP: beyaz karahindiba topları
  EN FP: blowing a dandelion
  tr FP: karahindiba üflemek
1941 | pirate (noun): a sea robber who attacks ships | loc: korsan
  EN TS: This pirate mouse looks like Jack Sparrow.
  tr TS: Bu korsan fare tam Jack Sparrow.
  EN FS: This pirate cat looks like Jack Sparrow.
  tr FS: Bu korsan kedi tam Jack Sparrow.
  EN TP: a pirate mouse
  tr TP: korsan bir fare
  EN FP: a pirate ship
  tr FP: bir korsan gemisi
1943 | gnome (noun): a tiny fairy-tale creature in a pointed hat | loc: gnom
  EN TS: The gnome's hat is green. Wow.
  tr TS: Gnomun şapkası yeşil. Vay be.
  EN FS: The gnome's hat is red. Wow.
  tr FS: Gnomun şapkası kırmızı. Vay be.
  EN TP: a gnome in green
  tr TP: yeşiller giymiş bir gnom
  EN FP: a gnome in red
  tr FP: kırmızılar giymiş bir gnom
1944 | ribs (noun): the curved bones around your chest | loc: kaburgalar
  EN TS: Fact: you can see its ribs.
  tr TS: Bilgi: kaburgaları görünüyor.
  EN FS: Fact: you can see its heart.
  tr FS: Bilgi: kalbi görünüyor.
  EN TP: a cage of ribs
  tr TP: kaburgalardan bir kafes
  EN FP: ribs on a grill
  tr FP: ızgarada kaburgalar
1945 | spooky (adjective): strange and frightening, like a ghost place | loc: ürkütücü
  EN TS: What a spooky castle!
  tr TS: Ne ürkütücü bir şato!
  EN FS: What a spooky church!
  tr FS: Ne ürkütücü bir kilise!
  EN TP: a spooky castle on rocks
  tr TP: kayalıklarda ürkütücü bir şato
  EN FP: a spooky castle in snow
  tr FP: karda ürkütücü bir şato
1946 | cool (adjective): stylish and relaxed in a way people admire | loc: havalı
  EN TS: This cat is too cool.
  tr TS: Bu kedi fazla havalı.
  EN FS: This dog is too cool.
  tr FS: Bu köpek fazla havalı.
  EN TP: a cool cat in sunglasses
  tr TP: güneş gözlüklü havalı bir kedi
  EN FP: a cool summer drink
  tr FP: serin bir yaz içeceği
1947 | mane (noun): the long thick hair round a lion's neck | loc: yele
  EN TS: Just a normal rainbow mane.
  tr TS: Sıradan bir gökkuşağı yelesi işte.
  EN FS: Just a normal black mane.
  tr FS: Sıradan bir siyah yele işte.
  EN TP: a rainbow mane
  tr TP: gökkuşağı renkli bir yele
  EN FP: a rainbow over a lion
  tr FP: aslanın üstünde gökkuşağı
1948 | wavy (adjective): forming soft curves instead of lying straight | loc: dalgalı
  EN TS: Her wavy hair is everywhere!
  tr TS: Dalgalı saçları her yerde!
  EN FS: Her short hair is everywhere!
  tr FS: Kısa saçları her yerde!
  EN TP: wavy hair full of leaves
  tr TP: yapraklarla dolu dalgalı saç
  EN FP: wavy hair full of flowers
  tr FP: çiçeklerle dolu dalgalı saç
1949 | enchanted (adjective): under a magic spell | loc: büyülü
  EN TS: This forest is so enchanted.
  tr TS: Bu orman resmen büyülü.
  EN FS: This forest is so burnt.
  tr FS: Bu orman resmen yanmış.
  EN TP: an enchanted forest path
  tr TP: büyülü bir orman yolu
  EN FP: an enchanted castle
  tr FP: büyülü bir şato
1950 | evil (adjective): deeply bad and cruel | loc: kötü
  EN TS: This evil tower needs a lift.
  tr TS: Bu kötü kuleye bir asansör lazım.
  EN FS: This evil church needs a lift.
  tr FS: Bu kötü kiliseye bir asansör lazım.
  EN TP: an evil fortress
  tr TP: kötü bir kale
  EN FP: an evil stepmother
  tr FP: kötü bir üvey anne
1951 | armchair (noun): a big soft chair with supports for your arms | loc: koltuk
  EN TS: An armchair awaits a reader.
  tr TS: Bir koltuk okurunu bekliyor.
  EN FS: A sofa awaits a reader.
  tr FS: Bir kanepe okurunu bekliyor.
  EN TP: a worn leather armchair
  tr TP: eskimiş deri bir koltuk
  EN FP: a new plastic armchair
  tr FP: yeni plastik bir koltuk
1952 | full moon (noun): the whole bright round disc seen in the night sky | loc: dolunay
  EN TS: A full moon behind one tree.
  tr TS: Tek bir ağacın arkasında dolunay.
  EN FS: A full moon behind two trees.
  tr FS: İki ağacın arkasında dolunay.
  EN TP: full moon behind a tree
  tr TP: ağacın arkasında dolunay
  EN FP: full moon over the sea
  tr FP: denizin üstünde dolunay
1953 | snowflake (noun): a single small ice crystal that falls as snow | loc: kar tanesi
  EN TS: Snowflake crown? Queen vibes.
  tr TS: Kar tanelerinden taç mı? Kraliçe havası.
  EN FS: Flower crown? Queen vibes.
  tr FS: Çiçeklerden taç mı? Kraliçe havası.
  EN TP: a crown of snowflakes
  tr TP: kar tanelerinden bir taç
  EN FP: snowflakes on a window
  tr FP: camda kar taneleri
1955 | fairy tale (noun): a magical story world with witches and elves | loc: masal
  EN TS: OMG, it's a fairy tale house.
  tr TS: Aaa, bu bir masal evi!
  EN FS: OMG, it's a fairy tale boat.
  tr FS: Aaa, bu bir masal teknesi!
  EN TP: a fairy tale cottage
  tr TP: masal gibi bir kulübe
  EN FP: a fairy tale castle
  tr FP: masal gibi bir şato
1957 | cobblestones (noun): the round stones that pave old streets | loc: arnavut kaldırımı
  EN TS: The cobblestones are wet.
  tr TS: Arnavut kaldırımı ıslak.
  EN FS: The cobblestones are snowy.
  tr FS: Arnavut kaldırımı karlı.
  EN TP: wet cobblestones at night
  tr TP: gece ıslak Arnavut kaldırımı
  EN FP: cobblestones on a beach
  tr FP: kumsalda Arnavut kaldırımı
1958 | stairs (noun): a flight of steps | loc: merdiven
  EN TS: Stone stairs and pink flowers.
  tr TS: Taş merdiven ve pembe çiçekler.
  EN FS: Stone stairs and red flowers.
  tr FS: Taş merdiven ve kırmızı çiçekler.
  EN TP: stone stairs in a village
  tr TP: köyde taş merdiven
  EN FP: stone stairs in a castle
  tr FP: şatoda taş merdiven
1959 | braid (noun): hair woven into one plaited strand | loc: örgü
  EN TS: Her braid reaches her waist.
  tr TS: Örgüsü beline kadar uzanıyor.
  EN FS: Her braid reaches her knees.
  tr FS: Örgüsü dizlerine kadar uzanıyor.
  EN TP: a waist-long braid
  tr TP: bele kadar uzun bir örgü
  EN FP: a short braid
  tr FP: kısa bir örgü
1960 | samurai (noun): a Japanese warrior who fights with a sword | loc: samuray
  EN TS: She's walking like a real samurai.
  tr TS: Gerçek bir samuray gibi yürüyor.
  EN FS: She's dancing like a real samurai.
  tr FS: Gerçek bir samuray gibi dans ediyor.
  EN TP: a samurai with a sword
  tr TP: kılıçlı bir samuray
  EN FP: a samurai with a bow
  tr FP: yay taşıyan bir samuray
1961 | bone (noun): the rigid tissue that makes up the skeleton | loc: kemik
  EN TS: These bones love a good book.
  tr TS: Bu kemikler iyi bir kitaba bayılıyor.
  EN FS: These bones love a good film.
  tr FS: Bu kemikler iyi bir filme bayılıyor.
  EN TP: bones over an open book
  tr TP: açık kitabın üstünde kemikler
  EN FP: a dog with a bone
  tr FP: kemik kemiren bir köpek
1962 | fortress (noun): a large strong building made to defend | loc: kale
  EN TS: This fortress looks scary!
  tr TS: Bu kale korkunç görünüyor!
  EN FS: This cottage looks scary!
  tr FS: Bu kulübe korkunç görünüyor!
  EN TP: a dark hilltop fortress
  tr TP: tepede karanlık bir kale
  EN FP: a fortress in the desert
  tr FP: çölde bir kale
1964 | haunted (adjective): believed to have ghosts living inside | loc: perili
  EN TS: The house must be haunted.
  tr TS: Bu ev kesin perili.
  EN FS: The school must be haunted.
  tr FS: Bu okul kesin perili.
  EN TP: a haunted old house
  tr TP: perili eski bir ev
  EN FP: a haunted old ship
  tr FP: perili eski bir gemi
1965 | cabin (noun): a small simple wooden house | loc: kulübe
  EN TS: Cosy cabin. A bit of snow.
  tr TS: Sıcacık kulübe. Birazcık kar.
  EN FS: Cosy cabin. A bit of sand.
  tr FS: Sıcacık kulübe. Birazcık kum.
  EN TP: a snowy wooden cabin
  tr TP: karlı ahşap bir kulübe
  EN FP: a cabin on a ship
  tr FP: gemide bir kamara
1966 | path (noun): a narrow marked way that you walk along | loc: patika
  EN TS: The path is made of stones.
  tr TS: Patika taşlardan yapılmış.
  EN FS: The path is made of wood.
  tr FS: Patika tahtadan yapılmış.
  EN TP: a cobblestone path
  tr TP: taş döşeli bir patika
  EN FP: a forest path
  tr FP: bir orman patikası
1967 | cute (adjective): small and sweet in a way that makes you smile | loc: sevimli
  EN TS: The baby fox is so cute!
  tr TS: Yavru tilki çok sevimli!
  EN FS: The baby bear is so cute!
  tr FS: Yavru ayı çok sevimli!
  EN TP: a cute baby fox
  tr TP: sevimli bir yavru tilki
  EN FP: a cute baby bird
  tr FP: sevimli bir yavru kuş
1968 | raven (noun): a large black bird like a big crow | loc: kuzgun
  EN TS: I think those are ravens.
  tr TS: Bence bunlar kuzgun.
  EN FS: I think those are parrots.
  tr FS: Bence bunlar papağan.
  EN TP: ravens flying around her
  tr TP: etrafında uçan kuzgunlar
  EN FP: ravens sitting on her arm
  tr FP: koluna konmuş kuzgunlar
1969 | bouquet (noun): a bunch of flowers arranged together | loc: buket
  EN TS: A bouquet from space? Romantic!
  tr TS: Uzaydan buket mi? Çok romantik!
  EN FS: A bouquet from the sea? Romantic!
  tr FS: Denizden buket mi? Çok romantik!
  EN TP: gathering a bouquet
  tr TP: buket için çiçek toplamak
  EN FP: throwing a bouquet
  tr FP: buket atmak
1970 | hut (noun): a small simple building | loc: kulübe
  EN TS: The hut has one plank door. Basic, but solid.
  tr TS: Kulübenin tek bir tahta kapısı var. Basit ama sağlam.
  EN FS: The hut has one glass door. Basic, but solid.
  tr FS: Kulübenin tek bir cam kapısı var. Basit ama sağlam.
  EN TP: a tiny snowy hut
  tr TP: minik, karlı bir kulübe
  EN FP: a tiny beach hut
  tr FP: minik bir plaj kulübesi
1971 | peak (noun): the pointed top of a mountain | loc: zirve
  EN TS: Peaks over clouds. Unreal.
  tr TS: Bulutların üstünde zirveler. Efsane.
  EN FS: Peaks under clouds. Unreal.
  tr FS: Bulutların altında zirveler. Efsane.
  EN TP: snowy peaks above the clouds
  tr TP: bulutların üstünde karlı zirveler
  EN FP: peaks covered in forest
  tr FP: ormanla kaplı zirveler
1972 | turban (noun): a long cloth wound around the head | loc: sarık
  EN TS: That turban is a whole tower!
  tr TS: O sarık resmen bir kule!
  EN FS: That crown is a whole tower!
  tr FS: O taç resmen bir kule!
  EN TP: a tall jeweled turban
  tr TP: mücevherli, yüksek bir sarık
  EN FP: a turban in the desert
  tr FP: çölde bir sarık
1973 | goddess (noun): a female god | loc: tanrıça
  EN TS: This goddess looks Egyptian.
  tr TS: Bu tanrıça Mısırlı gibi.
  EN FS: This goddess looks Japanese.
  tr FS: Bu tanrıça Japon gibi.
  EN TP: a goddess with golden wings
  tr TP: altın kanatlı bir tanrıça
  EN FP: a goddess with a bow
  tr FP: yay taşıyan bir tanrıça
1974 | ballerina (noun): a girl who dances ballet on her toes | loc: balerin
  EN TS: The ballerina is on her toes.
  tr TS: Balerin parmak uçlarında.
  EN FS: The ballerina is on her knees.
  tr FS: Balerin dizlerinin üstünde.
  EN TP: a ballerina in a tutu
  tr TP: tütülü bir balerin
  EN FP: a ballerina shoe
  tr FP: bir balerin ayakkabısı
1976 | skate (verb): to glide over ice wearing ice skates | loc: paten kaymak
  EN TS: Four kids are skating while squirrels judge them.
  tr TS: Dört çocuk paten kayıyor, sincaplar da onlara puan veriyor.
  EN FS: Four kids are skating while dogs judge them.
  tr FS: Dört çocuk paten kayıyor, köpekler de onlara puan veriyor.
  EN TP: skating on a frozen pond
  tr TP: donmuş gölette paten kaymak
  EN FP: skating on a half-pipe
  tr FP: rampada paten kaymak
1977 | creepy (adjective): making you feel nervous and a bit scared | loc: ürkütücü
  EN TS: The bats make it extra creepy!
  tr TS: Yarasalar ortamı daha da ürkütücü yapıyor!
  EN FS: The owls make it extra creepy!
  tr FS: Baykuşlar ortamı daha da ürkütücü yapıyor!
  EN TP: a creepy ruined house
  tr TP: ürkütücü, yıkık bir ev
  EN FP: a creepy old doll
  tr FP: ürkütücü eski bir oyuncak bebek
1979 | dye (verb): to change the colour of hair or cloth | loc: boyamak
  EN TS: She dyed it purple. Bold!
  tr TS: Mora boyamış. Cesur!
  EN FS: She dyed it green. Bold!
  tr FS: Yeşile boyamış. Cesur!
  EN TP: hair dyed bright purple
  tr TP: parlak mora boyanmış saç
  EN FP: hair dyed bright green
  tr FP: parlak yeşile boyanmış saç
1980 | pine (noun): a tall evergreen tree with needles | loc: çam
  EN TS: Evergreen pines surround the hut.
  tr TS: Kulübeyi her dem yeşil çamlar sarıyor.
  EN FS: Evergreen palms surround the hut.
  tr FS: Kulübeyi her dem yeşil palmiyeler sarıyor.
  EN TP: snowy pine trees
  tr TP: karlı çam ağaçları
  EN FP: a pine table
  tr FP: çam bir masa
1981 | crash (verb): to hit something hard with a loud noise | loc: çarpmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Waves are crashing into the lighthouse!
  tr TS: Dalgalar deniz fenerine çarpıyor!
  EN FS: Waves are crashing into the harbour!
  tr FS: Dalgalar limana çarpıyor!
  EN TP: waves crashing on rocks
  tr TP: kayalara çarpan dalgalar
  EN FP: crashing on a friend's sofa
  tr FP: arkadaşın kanepesinde sızmak
1982 | cluttered (adjective): untidily full of far too many things | loc: dağınık
  EN TS: The room is "a bit" cluttered.
  tr TS: Oda "biraz" dağınık.
  EN FS: The room is "a bit" empty.
  tr FS: Oda "biraz" boş.
  EN TP: cluttered shelves
  tr TP: dağınık raflar
  EN FP: a cluttered desk
  tr FP: dağınık bir masa
1983 | eyelashes (noun): the small hairs on the edge of the eyelids | loc: kirpikler
  EN TS: Her eyelashes are very long.
  tr TS: Kirpikleri çok uzun.
  EN FS: Her eyelashes are very short.
  tr FS: Kirpikleri çok kısa.
  EN TP: long dark eyelashes
  tr TP: uzun, koyu kirpikler
  EN FP: fake eyelashes in a box
  tr FP: kutuda takma kirpikler
1984 | pale (adjective): very light, almost white in colour | loc: solgun
  EN TS: Her face is very pale.
  tr TS: Yüzü çok solgun.
  EN FS: Her face is very dark.
  tr FS: Yüzü çok bronz.
  EN TP: a pale white face
  tr TP: solgun, bembeyaz bir yüz
  EN FP: a pale blue sky
  tr FP: soluk mavi bir gökyüzü
1985 | bright (adjective): strong and full of color, easy to see | loc: parlak
  EN TS: The tree is bright red!
  tr TS: Ağaç parlak kırmızı!
  EN FS: The tree is bright green!
  tr FS: Ağaç parlak yeşil!
  EN TP: bright red leaves
  tr TP: parlak kırmızı yapraklar
  EN FP: bright red apples
  tr FP: parlak kırmızı elmalar
1986 | bare (adjective): not covered — no leaves, no clothes | loc: çıplak
  EN TS: The tree is bare. So sad.
  tr TS: Ağaç çıplak. Çok üzücü.
  EN FS: The tree is green. So sad.
  tr FS: Ağaç yemyeşil. Çok üzücü.
  EN TP: a bare tree at night
  tr TP: gece çıplak bir ağaç
  EN FP: bare feet in the grass
  tr FP: çimenlerde çıplak ayaklar
1987 | future (phrase): the time that will come after now | loc: gelecek
  EN TS: This city is from the future.
  tr TS: Bu şehir gelecekten.
  EN FS: This city is from the past.
  tr FS: Bu şehir geçmişten.
  EN TP: a city of the future
  tr TP: geleceğin şehri
  EN FP: a city of the past
  tr FP: geçmişin şehri
1988 | fence (noun): a barrier that goes around an area | loc: çit
  EN TS: The fence has sharp spikes.
  tr TS: Çitin sivri uçları var.
  EN FS: The fence has no gate.
  tr FS: Çitin kapısı yok.
  EN TP: a spiked iron fence
  tr TP: sivri uçlu demir bir çit
  EN FP: a wooden garden fence
  tr FP: ahşap bir bahçe çiti
1989 | potion (noun): a magic drink made for a special effect | loc: iksir
  EN TS: Old potions fill the shelves.
  tr TS: Rafları eski iksirler dolduruyor.
  EN FS: Old shoes fill the shelves.
  tr FS: Rafları eski ayakkabılar dolduruyor.
  EN TP: shelves of old potions
  tr TP: raflarda eski iksirler
  EN FP: a potion in a cauldron
  tr FP: kazanda bir iksir
1990 | comfortable (adjective): giving a feeling of physical well-being | loc: rahat
  EN TS: A super comfortable armchair.
  tr TS: Aşırı rahat bir koltuk.
  EN FS: A super comfortable sofa.
  tr FS: Aşırı rahat bir kanepe.
  EN TP: a comfortable golden armchair
  tr TP: rahat, altın bir koltuk
  EN FP: a comfortable golden bed
  tr FP: rahat, altın bir yatak
1991 | type (verb): to write using a keyboard | loc: yazmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is typing like a machine!
  tr TS: Makine gibi yazıyor!
  EN FS: He is painting like a machine!
  tr FS: Makine gibi resim yapıyor!
  EN TP: typing on a keyboard
  tr TP: klavyede yazmak
  EN FP: typing on a phone
  tr FP: telefonda yazmak
1992 | listen (verb): to hear something on purpose | loc: dinlemek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is listening through big green headphones.
  tr TS: Büyük yeşil kulaklıklarla dinliyor.
  EN FS: She is listening through big red headphones.
  tr FS: Büyük kırmızı kulaklıklarla dinliyor.
  EN TP: listening to music
  tr TP: müzik dinlemek
  EN FP: listening to a teacher
  tr FP: öğretmeni dinlemek
1994 | on top of (preposition): resting on the highest part of something | loc: üstünde
  EN TS: A cat is on top of the books.
  tr TS: Kitapların üstünde bir kedi var.
  EN FS: A cat is on top of the hedge.
  tr FS: Çalılığın üstünde bir kedi var.
  EN TP: on top of the books
  tr TP: kitapların üstünde
  EN FP: on top of the car
  tr FP: arabanın üstünde
1995 | doorway (noun): the opening in a wall where a door is | loc: kapı aralığı
  EN TS: This doorway leads to another world.
  tr TS: Bu kapı aralığı başka bir dünyaya açılıyor.
  EN FS: This doorway leads to a dark cellar.
  tr FS: Bu kapı aralığı karanlık bir mahzene açılıyor.
  EN TP: a glowing arched doorway
  tr TP: parlayan, kemerli bir kapı aralığı
  EN FP: a doorway to the kitchen
  tr FP: mutfağa açılan kapı aralığı
1997 | axe (noun): a tool with a heavy blade for chopping | loc: balta
  EN TS: That battle axe is huge!
  tr TS: O savaş baltası kocaman!
  EN FS: That battle shield is huge!
  tr FS: O savaş kalkanı kocaman!
  EN TP: holding a battle axe
  tr TP: savaş baltası tutmak
  EN FP: holding a battle flag
  tr FP: savaş bayrağı tutmak
1998 | mansion (noun): a very large and impressive house | loc: konak
  EN TS: Rich people live in this mansion.
  tr TS: Bu konakta zenginler yaşıyor.
  EN FS: Rich people live in this cottage.
  tr FS: Bu kulübede zenginler yaşıyor.
  EN TP: a mansion at dusk
  tr TP: alacakaranlıkta bir konak
  EN FP: a mansion on the beach
  tr FP: sahilde bir konak
1999 | fur (noun): the soft thick hair covering an animal | loc: kürk
  EN TS: Bro, that fur is so thick.
  tr TS: Kanka, şu kürk ne kadar kalın.
  EN FS: Bro, that fur is so black.
  tr FS: Kanka, şu kürk ne kadar siyah.
  EN TP: thick white fur
  tr TP: kalın beyaz kürk
  EN FP: a white fur coat
  tr FP: beyaz bir kürk manto
2000 | moonlight (noun): the light the moon gives at night | loc: ay ışığı
  EN TS: Moonlight is shining on water.
  tr TS: Ay ışığı suyun üstünde parlıyor.
  EN FS: Sunlight is shining on water.
  tr FS: Güneş ışığı suyun üstünde parlıyor.
  EN TP: moonlight on a marsh
  tr TP: bataklıkta ay ışığı
  EN FP: moonlight in a bedroom
  tr FP: yatak odasında ay ışığı
2001 | beak (noun): the hard pointed mouth part of a bird | loc: gaga
  EN TS: The owl has a gold beak. Rich owl!
  tr TS: Baykuşun gagası altın. Zengin baykuş!
  EN FS: The owl has a red beak. Rich owl!
  tr FS: Baykuşun gagası kırmızı. Zengin baykuş!
  EN TP: an owl's golden beak
  tr TP: baykuşun altın gagası
  EN FP: an owl's broken beak
  tr FP: baykuşun kırık gagası
2002 | whiskers (noun): the long stiff hairs on a cat's face | loc: bıyıklar
  EN TS: The cat has long whiskers.
  tr TS: Kedinin uzun bıyıkları var.
  EN FS: The cat has short whiskers.
  tr FS: Kedinin kısa bıyıkları var.
  EN TP: a cat with long whiskers
  tr TP: uzun bıyıklı bir kedi
  EN FP: a man with long whiskers
  tr FP: uzun bıyıklı bir adam
2005 | crow (noun): a big all-black bird with a harsh call | loc: karga
  EN TS: The crow is waiting for news.
  tr TS: Karga haber bekliyor.
  EN FS: The owl is waiting for news.
  tr FS: Baykuş haber bekliyor.
  EN TP: a crow on a branch
  tr TP: dalda bir karga
  EN FP: a crow on a scarecrow
  tr FP: korkulukta bir karga
2008 | trunk (noun): the thick wooden stem of a tree | loc: gövde
  EN TS: The trunk is huge and twisted.
  tr TS: Gövde kocaman ve burgulu.
  EN FS: The trunk is thin and smooth.
  tr FS: Gövde ince ve pürüzsüz.
  EN TP: a massive twisted trunk
  tr TP: kocaman, burgulu bir gövde
  EN FP: an elephant's trunk
  tr FP: bir filin hortumu
2010 | story (noun): a tale about people and events | loc: hikâye
  EN TS: The story is coming alive!
  tr TS: Hikâye canlanıyor!
  EN FS: The story is burning!
  tr FS: Hikâye yanıyor!
  EN TP: a story coming alive
  tr TP: canlanan bir hikâye
  EN FP: a story about a city
  tr FP: bir şehir hakkında hikâye
2011 | open (adjective): not closed, so you can go or see through | loc: açık
  EN TS: The door is wide open.
  tr TS: Kapı ardına kadar açık.
  EN FS: The door is closed.
  tr FS: Kapı kapalı.
  EN TP: an open glass door
  tr TP: açık bir cam kapı
  EN FP: an open laptop
  tr FP: açık bir dizüstü bilgisayar
2012 | entrance (noun): something that gives you a way to get in | loc: giriş
  EN TS: Flowers cover the entrance.
  tr TS: Girişi çiçekler kaplıyor.
  EN FS: Snow covers the entrance.
  tr FS: Girişi kar kaplıyor.
  EN TP: a garden entrance with flowers
  tr TP: çiçekli bir bahçe girişi
  EN FP: a hotel entrance with flowers
  tr FP: çiçekli bir otel girişi
2013 | gothic (adjective): in a dark dramatic style with black clothes | loc: gotik
  EN TS: Her makeup? Totally gothic.
  tr TS: Makyajı mı? Tamamen gotik.
  EN FS: Her makeup? Totally pink.
  tr FS: Makyajı mı? Tamamen pembe.
  EN TP: a gothic look
  tr TP: gotik bir tarz
  EN FP: a gothic church
  tr FP: gotik bir kilise
2014 | dusk (noun): the fading light just before night | loc: alacakaranlık
  EN TS: Alone at dusk. So mysterious.
  tr TS: Alacakaranlıkta yapayalnız. Çok gizemli.
  EN FS: Alone at noon. So mysterious.
  tr FS: Öğlen vakti yapayalnız. Çok gizemli.
  EN TP: an old lane at dusk
  tr TP: alacakaranlıkta eski bir sokak
  EN FP: dusk on an empty beach
  tr FP: boş bir plajda alacakaranlık
2015 | monument (noun): a big old structure built to be remembered | loc: anıt
  EN TS: Fact: the monument is stone.
  tr TS: Bilgi: anıt taştan.
  EN FS: Fact: the monument is wood.
  tr FS: Bilgi: anıt tahtadan.
  EN TP: an old stone monument
  tr TP: eski, taş bir anıt
  EN FP: a monument in a square
  tr FP: meydanda bir anıt
2016 | wand (noun): a thin stick used to cast magic spells | loc: sihirli değnek
  EN TS: Harry Potter needs this wand, bro.
  tr TS: Harry Potter'ın bu sihirli değneğe ihtiyacı var, kanka.
  EN FS: Harry Potter needs this broom, bro.
  tr FS: Harry Potter'ın bu süpürgeye ihtiyacı var, kanka.
  EN TP: a glowing magic wand
  tr TP: parlayan bir sihirli değnek
  EN FP: a broken magic wand
  tr FP: kırık bir sihirli değnek
2019 | locomotive (noun): the engine at the front that pulls a train | loc: lokomotif
  EN TS: The locomotive runs on steam.
  tr TS: Lokomotif buharla çalışıyor.
  EN FS: The locomotive runs on diesel.
  tr FS: Lokomotif dizelle çalışıyor.
  EN TP: an old steam locomotive
  tr TP: eski bir buharlı lokomotif
  EN FP: an old diesel locomotive
  tr FP: eski bir dizel lokomotif
2021 | constellation (noun): a group of stars that forms a pattern | loc: takımyıldız
  EN TS: Constellations fill the sky.
  tr TS: Gökyüzünü takımyıldızlar dolduruyor.
  EN FS: Rainbows fill the sky.
  tr FS: Gökyüzünü gökkuşakları dolduruyor.
  EN TP: constellations above the house
  tr TP: evin üstünde takımyıldızlar
  EN FP: constellations on a map
  tr FP: haritada takımyıldızlar
2023 | gift (noun): something you are given for free | loc: hediye
  EN TS: Gifts were left in the snow!
  tr TS: Karda hediyeler bırakılmış!
  EN FS: Skis were left in the snow!
  tr FS: Karda kayaklar bırakılmış!
  EN TP: gift boxes in the snow
  tr TP: karda hediye kutuları
  EN FP: gift boxes under a bed
  tr FP: yatağın altında hediye kutuları
2024 | neon (adjective): glowing in bright electric colours | loc: neon
  EN TS: Neon signs everywhere!
  tr TS: Her yerde neon tabelalar!
  EN FS: Paper signs everywhere!
  tr FS: Her yerde kâğıt tabelalar!
  EN TP: pink and green neon signs
  tr TP: pembe ve yeşil neon tabelalar
  EN FP: a neon green jacket
  tr FP: neon yeşil bir ceket
2025 | futuristic (adjective): looking modern, high-tech and from the future | loc: fütüristik
  EN TS: Futuristic city, year 3000?
  tr TS: Fütüristik şehir, yıl 3000?
  EN FS: Futuristic village, year 3000?
  tr FS: Fütüristik köy, yıl 3000?
  EN TP: futuristic towers at night
  tr TP: gece fütüristik kuleler
  EN FP: a futuristic flying car
  tr FP: fütüristik uçan bir araba
2026 | study (noun): a room at home used for reading and working | loc: çalışma odası
  EN TS: What a dreamy study!
  tr TS: Ne hayalî bir çalışma odası!
  EN FS: What a dreamy kitchen!
  tr FS: Ne hayalî bir mutfak!
  EN TP: a study full of flowers
  tr TP: çiçeklerle dolu bir çalışma odası
  EN FP: a study full of students
  tr FP: öğrencilerle dolu bir çalışma odası
2028 | jug (noun): a container with a handle for holding liquid | loc: sürahi
  EN TS: A white jug sits among books.
  tr TS: Kitapların arasında beyaz bir sürahi duruyor.
  EN FS: A white cat sits among books.
  tr FS: Kitapların arasında beyaz bir kedi duruyor.
  EN TP: a jug on a bookshelf
  tr TP: kitaplıkta bir sürahi
  EN FP: a jug on a table
  tr FP: masada bir sürahi
2029 | trail (noun): a rough path through the countryside | loc: patika
  EN TS: The trail vanishes in the fog.
  tr TS: Patika siste kayboluyor.
  EN FS: The trail vanishes in the sea.
  tr FS: Patika denizde kayboluyor.
  EN TP: a stony mountain trail
  tr TP: taşlı bir dağ patikası
  EN FP: a trail of footprints
  tr FP: bir dizi ayak izi
2031 | twig (noun): a very small thin branch of a tree | loc: ince dal
  EN TS: Her hair has twigs. Weird.
  tr TS: Saçında ince dallar var. Tuhaf.
  EN FS: Her hair has flowers. Weird.
  tr FS: Saçında çiçekler var. Tuhaf.
  EN TP: twigs in her hair
  tr TP: saçında ince dallar
  EN FP: a nest of twigs
  tr FP: ince dallardan bir yuva
2032 | portal (noun): a gateway that leads into another world | loc: geçit
  EN TS: A portal to a golden city.
  tr TS: Altın bir şehre açılan bir geçit.
  EN FS: A portal to a dark forest.
  tr FS: Karanlık bir ormana açılan bir geçit.
  EN TP: a glowing round portal
  tr TP: parlayan, yuvarlak bir geçit
  EN FP: a portal under the sea
  tr FP: denizin altında bir geçit
2033 | whirlpool (noun): water that spins round and pulls things down | loc: girdap
  EN TS: The guitar is in a whirlpool!
  tr TS: Gitar bir girdabın içinde!
  EN FS: The guitar is in a desert!
  tr FS: Gitar bir çölün ortasında!
  EN TP: a guitar in a whirlpool
  tr TP: girdapta bir gitar
  EN FP: a boat in a whirlpool
  tr FP: girdapta bir tekne
2034 | poppy (noun): a wild flower with thin red petals | loc: gelincik
  EN TS: This poppy is red. Very red.
  tr TS: Bu gelincik kırmızı. Çok kırmızı.
  EN FS: This poppy is blue. Very blue.
  tr FS: Bu gelincik mavi. Çok mavi.
  EN TP: a red poppy bloom
  tr TP: kırmızı bir gelincik çiçeği
  EN FP: a field of poppies
  tr FP: bir gelincik tarlası
2035 | romance (noun): a loving relationship between two people | loc: aşk ilişkisi
  EN TS: This romance has a pink heart.
  tr TS: Bu aşk ilişkisinin pembe bir kalbi var.
  EN FS: This romance has a red heart.
  tr FS: Bu aşk ilişkisinin kırmızı bir kalbi var.
  EN TP: a romance in spring
  tr TP: baharda bir aşk ilişkisi
  EN FP: a romance novel
  tr FP: bir aşk romanı
2036 | spear (noun): a long pole weapon with a sharp tip | loc: mızrak
  EN TS: Spear supply is clearly not a problem.
  tr TS: Mızrak stoku belli ki sorun değil.
  EN FS: Sword supply is clearly not a problem.
  tr FS: Kılıç stoku belli ki sorun değil.
  EN TP: an army raising spears
  tr TP: mızrak kaldıran bir ordu
  EN FP: an army throwing spears
  tr FP: mızrak fırlatan bir ordu
2037 | creature (noun): a living being, especially a strange one | loc: yaratık
  EN TS: A creature with dark wings.
  tr TS: Kara kanatlı bir yaratık.
  EN FS: A creature with long horns.
  tr FS: Uzun boynuzlu bir yaratık.
  EN TP: a dark winged creature
  tr TP: kara kanatlı bir yaratık
  EN FP: a creature in the sea
  tr FP: denizde bir yaratık
2038 | afraid (adjective): filled with fear | loc: korkmuş
  EN TS: She is afraid, and the birds know it.
  tr TS: Korkmuş, kuşlar da bunu biliyor.
  EN FS: She is afraid, and the wolves know it.
  tr FS: Korkmuş, kurtlar da bunu biliyor.
  EN TP: afraid in a dark forest
  tr TP: karanlık ormanda korkmuş
  EN FP: afraid of a big dog
  tr FP: büyük bir köpekten korkmuş
2040 | decoration (noun): a pretty thing that makes a place look festive | loc: süs
  EN TS: Decorations are on every roof.
  tr TS: Her çatıda süsler var.
  EN FS: Snowmen are on every roof.
  tr FS: Her çatıda kardan adamlar var.
  EN TP: decorations on the roofs
  tr TP: çatılarda süsler
  EN FP: decorations in a box
  tr FP: kutuda süsler
2041 | bottle (noun): a plastic or glass container for liquids | loc: şişe
  EN TS: A whole sunset lives in this bottle.
  tr TS: Bu şişenin içinde koca bir gün batımı yaşıyor.
  EN FS: A whole ocean lives in this bottle.
  tr FS: Bu şişenin içinde koca bir okyanus yaşıyor.
  EN TP: a dark glass bottle
  tr TP: koyu renk cam bir şişe
  EN FP: a bottle of red wine
  tr FP: bir şişe kırmızı şarap
2042 | huge (adjective): unusually great in size | loc: kocaman
  EN TS: That moon is huge!
  tr TS: O ay kocaman!
  EN FS: That sun is huge!
  tr FS: O güneş kocaman!
  EN TP: a huge full moon
  tr TP: kocaman bir dolunay
  EN FP: a huge old castle
  tr FP: kocaman eski bir şato
2045 | tall (adjective): great in height, from the ground up | loc: uzun
  EN TS: These stones are super tall.
  tr TS: Bu taşlar aşırı uzun.
  EN FS: These trees are super tall.
  tr FS: Bu ağaçlar aşırı uzun.
  EN TP: tall standing stones
  tr TP: uzun dikili taşlar
  EN FP: tall trees in a field
  tr FP: tarlada uzun ağaçlar
2046 | snowy (adjective): covered with snow or full of falling snow | loc: karlı
  EN TS: A snowy night in the forest. So quiet...
  tr TS: Ormanda karlı bir gece. Ne kadar sessiz...
  EN FS: A snowy night in the city. So quiet...
  tr FS: Şehirde karlı bir gece. Ne kadar sessiz...
  EN TP: a snowy forest at night
  tr TP: gece karlı bir orman
  EN FP: a snowy street at night
  tr FP: gece karlı bir sokak
2048 | wild (adjective): living in nature, not kept by people | loc: vahşi
  EN TS: This wolf is wild!
  tr TS: Bu kurt vahşi!
  EN FS: This dog is wild!
  tr FS: Bu köpek vahşi!
  EN TP: a wild wolf
  tr TP: vahşi bir kurt
  EN FP: a wild party
  tr FP: çılgın bir parti
2049 | cozy (adjective): warm, comfortable and inviting | loc: rahat
  EN TS: The reading corner looks cozy.
  tr TS: Okuma köşesi çok rahat görünüyor.
  EN FS: The kitchen corner looks cozy.
  tr FS: Mutfak köşesi çok rahat görünüyor.
  EN TP: a cozy reading corner
  tr TP: rahat bir okuma köşesi
  EN FP: a cozy wool jumper
  tr FP: rahat bir yün kazak
2052 | mug (noun): a big cup with a handle for hot drinks | loc: kupa
  EN TS: The mug is on a pile of books.
  tr TS: Kupa bir kitap yığınının üstünde.
  EN FS: The mug is on a pile of boxes.
  tr FS: Kupa bir kutu yığınının üstünde.
  EN TP: a silver mug on books
  tr TP: kitapların üstünde gümüş bir kupa
  EN FP: a mug of cold milk
  tr FP: bir kupa soğuk süt
2053 | shelf (noun): a flat horizontal surface for holding objects | loc: raf
  EN TS: Bottles fill every shelf.
  tr TS: Her rafı şişeler dolduruyor.
  EN FS: Books fill every shelf.
  tr FS: Her rafı kitaplar dolduruyor.
  EN TP: shelves of old bottles
  tr TP: eski şişelerle dolu raflar
  EN FP: shelves of old books
  tr FP: eski kitaplarla dolu raflar
2055 | poison (noun): something that harms you if you drink it | loc: zehir
  EN TS: The "Rejuvenation" is poison.
  tr TS: "Gençleştirici" düpedüz zehir.
  EN FS: The "Rejuvenation" is juice.
  tr FS: "Gençleştirici" düpedüz meyve suyu.
  EN TP: a bottle of poison
  tr TP: bir şişe zehir
  EN FP: a bottle of wine
  tr FP: bir şişe şarap
2056 | full (adjective): containing as much as is possible | loc: dolu
  EN TS: The shelves are full of books.
  tr TS: Raflar kitaplarla dolu.
  EN FS: The shelves are full of jars.
  tr FS: Raflar kavanozlarla dolu.
  EN TP: shelves full of old books
  tr TP: eski kitaplarla dolu raflar
  EN FP: shelves full of old toys
  tr FP: eski oyuncaklarla dolu raflar
2057 | chimney (noun): a pipe on a roof that lets smoke out | loc: baca
  EN TS: The chimney is made of stone.
  tr TS: Baca taştan yapılmış.
  EN FS: The chimney is made of metal.
  tr FS: Baca metalden yapılmış.
  EN TP: a stone chimney in snow
  tr TP: karda taş bir baca
  EN FP: cleaning the chimney
  tr FP: baca temizlemek
2058 | reach (verb): to move your arm forward to touch something | loc: uzanmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A bear is reaching for a star.
  tr TS: Bir ayı bir yıldıza uzanıyor.
  EN FS: A bear is reaching for a bird.
  tr FS: Bir ayı bir kuşa uzanıyor.
  EN TP: reaching for a star
  tr TP: bir yıldıza uzanmak
  EN FP: reaching for the honey
  tr FP: bala uzanmak
2059 | sunlight (noun): the light that comes from the sun | loc: gün ışığı
  EN TS: Sunlight hits one side only.
  tr TS: Gün ışığı sadece bir tarafa vuruyor.
  EN FS: Moonlight hits one side only.
  tr FS: Ay ışığı sadece bir tarafa vuruyor.
  EN TP: branches in bright sunlight
  tr TP: parlak gün ışığında dallar
  EN FP: sunlight on the water
  tr FP: suda gün ışığı
2060 | skis (noun): a pair of long narrow boards for moving on snow | loc: kayak
  EN TS: Red and yellow skis, so cool.
  tr TS: Kırmızı-sarı kayaklar, çok havalı.
  EN FS: Blue and white skis, so cool.
  tr FS: Mavi-beyaz kayaklar, çok havalı.
  EN TP: skis standing in the snow
  tr TP: karda dikili kayaklar
  EN FP: skis on a car roof
  tr FP: araba tavanında kayaklar
2061 | galaxy (noun): a huge group of stars and glowing dust | loc: galaksi
  EN TS: The galaxy is showing off.
  tr TS: Galaksi resmen şov yapıyor.
  EN FS: The moon is showing off.
  tr FS: Ay resmen şov yapıyor.
  EN TP: a glowing purple galaxy
  tr TP: parlayan mor bir galaksi
  EN FP: a galaxy on a T-shirt
  tr FP: tişörtte bir galaksi
2062 | balance (verb): to keep something steady so it does not fall | loc: dengede tutmak
  EN TS: Someone balanced these stones.
  tr TS: Biri bu taşları dengede tutmayı başarmış.
  EN FS: Someone balanced these cups.
  tr FS: Biri bu bardakları dengede tutmayı başarmış.
  EN TP: stones balanced in a tower
  tr TP: kule gibi dengede duran taşlar
  EN FP: to balance on one leg
  tr FP: tek ayak üstünde dengede durmak
2064 | snow globe (noun): a glass ball with a tiny scene and snow inside | loc: kar küresi
  EN TS: The snow globe has a church.
  tr TS: Kar küresinde bir kilise var.
  EN FS: The snow globe has a castle.
  tr FS: Kar küresinde bir şato var.
  EN TP: a glowing snow globe
  tr TP: parlayan bir kar küresi
  EN FP: a broken snow globe
  tr FP: kırık bir kar küresi
2067 | lamppost (noun): a tall street pole with a light on top | loc: sokak lambası
  EN TS: One lamppost, lots of snow.
  tr TS: Bir sokak lambası, bir sürü kar.
  EN FS: One lamppost, lots of rain.
  tr FS: Bir sokak lambası, bir sürü yağmur.
  EN TP: a glowing lamppost
  tr TP: yanan bir sokak lambası
  EN FP: a dog by a lamppost
  tr FP: sokak lambasının yanında bir köpek
2068 | door (noun): the opening in a wall you enter or leave through | loc: kapı
  EN TS: The red door is open.
  tr TS: Kırmızı kapı açık.
  EN FS: The blue door is open.
  tr FS: Mavi kapı açık.
  EN TP: an open red door
  tr TP: açık duran kırmızı bir kapı
  EN FP: a red garage door
  tr FP: kırmızı bir garaj kapısı
2069 | reindeer (noun): a large deer with antlers from the cold north | loc: ren geyiği
  EN TS: The reindeer had a bad flight.
  tr TS: Ren geyiğinin uçuşu kötü geçti.
  EN FS: The reindeer had a fun flight.
  tr FS: Ren geyiğinin uçuşu eğlenceli geçti.
  EN TP: reindeer stuck on a turbine
  tr TP: türbine takılmış ren geyiği
  EN FP: reindeer pulling a sleigh
  tr FP: kızak çeken ren geyiği
2070 | electric guitar (noun): a guitar that needs an amplifier to be heard | loc: elektro gitar
  EN TS: The electric guitar is a rocket!
  tr TS: Elektro gitar resmen roket!
  EN FS: The electric guitar is sinking!
  tr FS: Elektro gitar batıyor!
  EN TP: an electric guitar taking off
  tr TP: havalanan bir elektro gitar
  EN FP: an electric guitar on stage
  tr FP: sahnede bir elektro gitar
2071 | vintage (adjective): old but classic and high quality | loc: vintage
  EN TS: Nice vintage car, so festive.
  tr TS: Şık vintage araba, tam bayram havası.
  EN FS: Nice vintage van, so festive.
  tr FS: Şık vintage minibüs, tam bayram havası.
  EN TP: a vintage red car
  tr TP: kırmızı vintage bir araba
  EN FP: a vintage red dress
  tr FP: kırmızı vintage bir elbise
2072 | cable (noun): a thick wire that carries power or data | loc: kablo
  EN TS: Cables cover the whole room!
  tr TS: Kablolar bütün odayı kaplamış!
  EN FS: Plants cover the whole room!
  tr FS: Bitkiler bütün odayı kaplamış!
  EN TP: glowing blue cables
  tr TP: parlayan mavi kablolar
  EN FP: cables on a bridge
  tr FP: köprüdeki kablolar
2073 | shine (verb): to be bright by casting or reflecting light | loc: parlamak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Look, the sun is shining in!
  tr TS: Bak, güneş içeri parlıyor!
  EN FS: Look, the moon is shining in!
  tr FS: Bak, ay içeri parlıyor!
  EN TP: sunlight shining in
  tr TP: içeri parlayan gün ışığı
  EN FP: moonlight shining in
  tr FP: içeri parlayan ay ışığı
2075 | windowsill (noun): the flat shelf at the bottom of a window | loc: pencere pervazı
  EN TS: Books sit on the windowsill.
  tr TS: Pencere pervazında kitaplar duruyor.
  EN FS: Cats sit on the windowsill.
  tr FS: Pencere pervazında kediler duruyor.
  EN TP: books on a windowsill
  tr TP: pencere pervazında kitaplar
  EN FP: plants on a windowsill
  tr FP: pencere pervazında bitkiler
2076 | literature (noun): written works such as novels, poems and stories | loc: edebiyat
  EN TS: So much literature, so little time.
  tr TS: Bu kadar çok edebiyat, bu kadar az zaman.
  EN FS: So many pizzas, so little time.
  tr FS: Bu kadar çok pizza, bu kadar az zaman.
  EN TP: shelves of old literature
  tr TP: eski edebiyatla dolu raflar
  EN FP: literature on a phone
  tr FP: telefonda edebiyat
2077 | stare (verb): to look at something for a long time | loc: dik dik bakmak
  EN TS: The owl is staring at me!
  tr TS: Baykuş bana dik dik bakıyor!
  EN FS: The cat is staring at me!
  tr FS: Kedi bana dik dik bakıyor!
  EN TP: staring at the viewer
  tr TP: izleyene dik dik bakmak
  EN FP: staring at the moon
  tr FP: aya dik dik bakmak
2078 | flame (noun): the bright burning part of a fire or candle | loc: alev
  EN TS: Two flames light the book.
  tr TS: Kitabı iki alev aydınlatıyor.
  EN FS: Three flames light the book.
  tr FS: Kitabı üç alev aydınlatıyor.
  EN TP: two candle flames
  tr TP: iki mum alevi
  EN FP: flames in a fireplace
  tr FP: şöminede alevler
2079 | wooden (adjective): made of wood | loc: ahşap
  EN TS: Everything here is wooden.
  tr TS: Burada her şey ahşap.
  EN FS: Everything here is plastic.
  tr FS: Burada her şey plastik.
  EN TP: tall wooden bookcases
  tr TP: uzun ahşap kitaplıklar
  EN FP: tall wooden ladders
  tr FP: uzun ahşap merdivenler
2080 | pagoda (noun): an Asian temple with tiered curved roofs | loc: pagoda
  EN TS: Snow is falling on the pagoda.
  tr TS: Pagodaya kar yağıyor.
  EN FS: Rain is falling on the pagoda.
  tr FS: Pagodaya yağmur yağıyor.
  EN TP: a red pagoda in snow
  tr TP: karda kırmızı bir pagoda
  EN FP: a pagoda in the jungle
  tr FP: tropik ormanda bir pagoda
2081 | stepping stones (noun): flat stones you step on to cross water | loc: atlama taşları
  EN TS: Stepping stones cross a lake.
  tr TS: Atlama taşları gölün karşısına uzanıyor.
  EN FS: Stepping stones cross a road.
  tr FS: Atlama taşları yolun karşısına uzanıyor.
  EN TP: stepping stones across water
  tr TP: su üstünde atlama taşları
  EN FP: stepping stones in a garden
  tr FP: bahçede atlama taşları
2082 | cane (noun): a thin stick you lean on while walking | loc: baston
  EN TS: He is holding a thin cane.
  tr TS: İnce bir baston tutuyor.
  EN FS: He is holding a thin pipe.
  tr FS: İnce bir pipo tutuyor.
  EN TP: holding a walking cane
  tr TP: baston tutmak
  EN FP: a cane in the snow
  tr FP: karda bir baston
2084 | railway (noun): the line that runs trains for passengers | loc: demiryolu
  EN TS: A train on a wet railway.
  tr TS: Islak bir demiryolunda bir tren.
  EN FS: A train on a dry railway.
  tr FS: Kuru bir demiryolunda bir tren.
  EN TP: a railway at night
  tr TP: gece bir demiryolu
  EN FP: a railway in the desert
  tr FP: çölde bir demiryolu
2086 | festive (adjective): cheerful and decorated for a celebration | loc: şenlikli
  EN TS: The street looks so festive!
  tr TS: Sokak çok şenlikli görünüyor!
  EN FS: The street looks so sunny!
  tr FS: Sokak çok güneşli görünüyor!
  EN TP: a festive snowy street
  tr TP: şenlikli, karlı bir sokak
  EN FP: a festive dinner table
  tr FP: şenlikli bir akşam yemeği masası
2087 | skyline (noun): the outline of a city against the sky | loc: şehir silueti
  EN TS: A foggy steampunk skyline.
  tr TS: Sisli, steampunk bir şehir silueti.
  EN FS: A foggy desert skyline.
  tr FS: Sisli bir çöl şehri silueti.
  EN TP: a skyline in the fog
  tr TP: siste bir şehir silueti
  EN FP: a skyline at midnight
  tr FP: gece yarısı bir şehir silueti
2088 | handsome (adjective): good-looking, used about a man | loc: yakışıklı
  EN TS: The handsome man has a beard.
  tr TS: Yakışıklı adamın sakalı var.
  EN FS: The handsome man has glasses.
  tr FS: Yakışıklı adamın gözlüğü var.
  EN TP: a handsome bearded man
  tr TP: sakallı, yakışıklı bir adam
  EN FP: a handsome man with glasses
  tr FP: gözlüklü, yakışıklı bir adam
2089 | antlers (noun): the branching horns on a deer's head | loc: boynuzlar
  EN TS: Man, those antlers are huge.
  tr TS: Kanka, şu boynuzlar kocaman.
  EN FS: Man, those antlers are tiny.
  tr FS: Kanka, şu boynuzlar minicik.
  EN TP: huge branching antlers
  tr TP: kocaman, dallı boynuzlar
  EN FP: antlers on the wall
  tr FP: duvarda boynuzlar
2091 | pine tree (noun): a tall tree with needles and cones | loc: çam ağacı
  EN TS: The pine tree stands alone.
  tr TS: Çam ağacı tek başına duruyor.
  EN FS: The palm tree stands alone.
  tr FS: Palmiye ağacı tek başına duruyor.
  EN TP: a frosty pine tree
  tr TP: kırağılı bir çam ağacı
  EN FP: a pine tree with lights
  tr FP: ışıklı bir çam ağacı
2092 | fluffy (adjective): soft and light, like fur or feathers | loc: tüylü
  EN TS: What a fluffy owl!
  tr TS: Ne kadar tüylü bir baykuş!
  EN FS: What a fluffy cat!
  tr FS: Ne kadar tüylü bir kedi!
  EN TP: a fluffy blue owl
  tr TP: tüylü mavi bir baykuş
  EN FP: a fluffy blue blanket
  tr FP: tüylü mavi bir battaniye
2093 | green (adjective): the color between blue and yellow | loc: yeşil
  EN TS: The whole city is green.
  tr TS: Bütün şehir yeşil.
  EN FS: The whole city is grey.
  tr FS: Bütün şehir gri.
  EN TP: green towers full of trees
  tr TP: ağaç dolu yeşil kuleler
  EN FP: green paint on the towers
  tr FP: yeşile boyanmış kuleler
2095 | long (adjective): measuring a lot from one end to the other | loc: uzun
  EN TS: Her long hair is teal.
  tr TS: Uzun saçları petrol mavisi.
  EN FS: Her long hair is black.
  tr FS: Uzun saçları siyah.
  EN TP: long flowing teal hair
  tr TP: uzun, dalgalı petrol mavisi saç
  EN FP: a long walk
  tr FP: uzun bir yürüyüş
2096 | red (adjective): the color at the end of the spectrum | loc: kırmızı
  EN TS: Even the sky is red!
  tr TS: Gökyüzü bile kırmızı!
  EN FS: Even the sky is green!
  tr FS: Gökyüzü bile yeşil!
  EN TP: a red desert sky
  tr TP: kırmızı bir çöl gökyüzü
  EN FP: a red sports car
  tr FP: kırmızı bir spor araba
2097 | ear (noun): the part of your head you hear with | loc: kulak
  EN TS: Those ears are bigger than its head!
  tr TS: O kulaklar kafasından büyük!
  EN FS: Those eyes are bigger than its head!
  tr FS: O gözler kafasından büyük!
  EN TP: enormous round ears
  tr TP: kocaman, yuvarlak kulaklar
  EN FP: ears under a hat
  tr FP: şapkanın altında kulaklar
2099 | tree house (noun): a small hut built high up among branches | loc: ağaç ev
  EN TS: This tree house is so cool!
  tr TS: Bu ağaç ev çok havalı!
  EN FS: This dog house is so cool!
  tr FS: Bu köpek kulübesi çok havalı!
  EN TP: a jungle tree house
  tr TP: tropik ormanda bir ağaç ev
  EN FP: a garden tree house
  tr FP: bahçede bir ağaç ev
2100 | gown (noun): a long formal dress worn to a ball | loc: balo elbisesi
  EN TS: Her gown is bigger than the garden!
  tr TS: Balo elbisesi bahçeden büyük!
  EN FS: Her hat is bigger than the garden!
  tr FS: Şapkası bahçeden büyük!
  EN TP: a huge blue ball gown
  tr TP: kocaman mavi bir balo elbisesi
  EN FP: a gown on a hanger
  tr FP: askıda bir balo elbisesi
2101 | together (adverb): with each other, close or touching | loc: birlikte
  EN TS: They are walking together.
  tr TS: Birlikte yürüyorlar.
  EN FS: They are running together.
  tr FS: Birlikte koşuyorlar.
  EN TP: walking close together
  tr TP: yan yana birlikte yürümek
  EN FP: sitting together in a cafe
  tr FP: kafede birlikte oturmak
2102 | collection (noun): a large group of similar things kept together | loc: koleksiyon
  EN TS: What a book collection!
  tr TS: Ne kitap koleksiyonu ama!
  EN FS: What a shoe collection!
  tr FS: Ne ayakkabı koleksiyonu ama!
  EN TP: a collection of old books
  tr TP: eski bir kitap koleksiyonu
  EN FP: a collection of old coins
  tr FP: eski bir para koleksiyonu
2104 | jewelry (noun): necklaces, earrings and rings that you wear | loc: mücevher
  EN TS: So much gold jewelry!
  tr TS: Ne çok altın mücevher!
  EN FS: So much silver jewelry!
  tr FS: Ne çok gümüş mücevher!
  EN TP: covered in gold jewelry
  tr TP: altın mücevherlere bürünmüş
  EN FP: selling gold jewelry
  tr FP: altın mücevher satmak
2105 | pile (noun): a heap of things placed on top of each other | loc: yığın
  EN TS: The piles of books might fall.
  tr TS: Kitap yığınları devrilebilir.
  EN FS: The piles of cups might fall.
  tr FS: Fincan yığınları devrilebilir.
  EN TP: leaning piles of books
  tr TP: yamuk kitap yığınları
  EN FP: a pile of clothes
  tr FP: bir yığın kıyafet
2107 | spaceship (noun): a large vehicle that travels through space | loc: uzay gemisi
  EN TS: Where is everyone on this spaceship?
  tr TS: Bu uzay gemisinde herkes nerede?
  EN FS: Where is everyone on this train?
  tr FS: Bu trende herkes nerede?
  EN TP: inside a spaceship
  tr TP: bir uzay gemisinin içi
  EN FP: a spaceship landing
  tr FP: iniş yapan bir uzay gemisi
2108 | pipe (noun): a tube that carries water or gas | loc: boru
  EN TS: Pipes run along the ceiling.
  tr TS: Tavan boyunca borular uzanıyor.
  EN FS: Wires run along the ceiling.
  tr FS: Tavan boyunca kablolar uzanıyor.
  EN TP: pipes along the ceiling
  tr TP: tavan boyunca borular
  EN FP: pipes under the floor
  tr FP: zeminin altında borular
2109 | tidy (adjective): arranged neatly and in good order | loc: düzenli
  EN TS: The books stand in tidy rows.
  tr TS: Kitaplar düzenli sıralar halinde duruyor.
  EN FS: The cups stand in tidy rows.
  tr FS: Fincanlar düzenli sıralar halinde duruyor.
  EN TP: tidy rows of books
  tr TP: düzenli kitap sıraları
  EN FP: a tidy desk
  tr FP: düzenli bir masa
2110 | silhouette (noun): a dark outline against a bright background | loc: siluet
  EN TS: Dark silhouette, neon city. Batman?
  tr TS: Karanlık siluet, neon şehir. Batman mi?
  EN FS: Dark silhouette, sunny beach. Batman?
  tr FS: Karanlık siluet, güneşli plaj. Batman mi?
  EN TP: a silhouette in a coat
  tr TP: paltolu bir siluet
  EN FP: a silhouette of a cat
  tr FP: bir kedi silueti
2112 | blazer (noun): a smart formal jacket worn over a shirt | loc: blazer ceket
  EN TS: Her blazer is bright yellow.
  tr TS: Blazer ceketi parlak sarı.
  EN FS: Her blazer is dark green.
  tr FS: Blazer ceketi koyu yeşil.
  EN TP: a bright yellow blazer
  tr TP: parlak sarı bir blazer ceket
  EN FP: taking off a blazer
  tr FP: blazer ceketini çıkarmak
2113 | yellow (adjective): the color between green and orange | loc: sarı
  EN TS: The flowers are bright yellow.
  tr TS: Çiçekler parlak sarı.
  EN FS: The flowers are bright purple.
  tr FS: Çiçekler parlak mor.
  EN TP: a dove on yellow flowers
  tr TP: sarı çiçeklerde bir güvercin
  EN FP: yellow flowers in a vase
  tr FP: vazoda sarı çiçekler
2114 | across (preposition): from one side to the other side | loc: karşıdan karşıya
  EN TS: A bridge across the stream.
  tr TS: Dereyi karşıdan karşıya geçen bir köprü.
  EN FS: A bridge across the road.
  tr FS: Yolu karşıdan karşıya geçen bir köprü.
  EN TP: a bridge across a stream
  tr TP: dereyi karşıdan karşıya geçen köprü
  EN FP: a house across the street
  tr FP: sokağın karşısında bir ev
2115 | yoga (noun): calm stretching poses with slow breathing | loc: yoga
  EN TS: A calm yoga pose.
  tr TS: Sakin bir yoga pozu.
  EN FS: A calm dance pose.
  tr FS: Sakin bir dans pozu.
  EN TP: a cross-legged yoga pose
  tr TP: bağdaş kurmuş bir yoga pozu
  EN FP: yoga on a paddleboard
  tr FP: sörf tahtasında yoga
2116 | seaweed (noun): green plants that grow in the sea | loc: deniz yosunu
  EN TS: Seaweed is floating around her.
  tr TS: Etrafında deniz yosunları süzülüyor.
  EN FS: Plastic is floating around her.
  tr FS: Etrafında plastikler süzülüyor.
  EN TP: seaweed around her head
  tr TP: başının etrafında deniz yosunu
  EN FP: seaweed on a sushi roll
  tr FP: suşi rulosunda deniz yosunu
2117 | pocket watch (noun): a round watch carried on a chain | loc: köstekli saat
  EN TS: No phone, just a pocket watch.
  tr TS: Telefon yok, sadece köstekli saat.
  EN FS: No phone, just a wrist watch.
  tr FS: Telefon yok, sadece kol saati.
  EN TP: a golden pocket watch
  tr TP: altın bir köstekli saat
  EN FP: checking a pocket watch
  tr FP: köstekli saate bakmak
2118 | fancy (adjective): decorated, expensive-looking and not plain | loc: gösterişli
  EN TS: Such fancy golden shops!
  tr TS: Ne gösterişli altın dükkânlar!
  EN FS: Such fancy silver shops!
  tr FS: Ne gösterişli gümüş dükkânlar!
  EN TP: fancy golden shopfronts
  tr TP: gösterişli altın vitrinler
  EN FP: a fancy dress party
  tr FP: gösterişli bir kostüm partisi
2119 | pattern (noun): a repeated design of shapes and colors | loc: desen
  EN TS: The owl has red patterns.
  tr TS: Baykuşun kırmızı desenleri var.
  EN FS: The owl has green patterns.
  tr FS: Baykuşun yeşil desenleri var.
  EN TP: feather patterns
  tr TP: tüy desenleri
  EN FP: patterns on a dress
  tr FP: elbisede desenler
2120 | perch (verb): to sit on a branch or a ledge, like a bird | loc: tünemek
  EN TS: A bird is perched on a twig.
  tr TS: Bir kuş ince bir dala tünemiş.
  EN FS: A bird is perched on a wire.
  tr FS: Bir kuş bir tele tünemiş.
  EN TP: perched on a blossom branch
  tr TP: çiçekli bir dala tünemiş
  EN FP: perched on a window sill
  tr FP: pencere pervazına tünemiş
2121 | heavy (adjective): of great physical weight | loc: ağır
  EN TS: Heavy rocks, perfect balance.
  tr TS: Ağır kayalar, kusursuz denge.
  EN FS: Heavy bricks, perfect balance.
  tr FS: Ağır tuğlalar, kusursuz denge.
  EN TP: a tower of heavy rocks
  tr TP: ağır kayalardan bir kule
  EN FP: a heavy bag of rocks
  tr FP: kaya dolu ağır bir çanta
2123 | factory (noun): a building where machines make things | loc: fabrika
  EN TS: This factory touches the sky.
  tr TS: Bu fabrika gökyüzüne değiyor.
  EN FS: This factory touches the sea.
  tr FS: Bu fabrika denize değiyor.
  EN TP: a giant steampunk factory
  tr TP: dev bir steampunk fabrika
  EN FP: a tiny steampunk factory
  tr FP: minicik bir steampunk fabrika
2124 | road (noun): an open public way for travel by vehicles | loc: yol
  EN TS: She is walking on a wet road.
  tr TS: Islak bir yolda yürüyor.
  EN FS: She is walking on a wet beach.
  tr FS: Islak bir kumsalda yürüyor.
  EN TP: walking down a country road
  tr TP: köy yolunda yürümek
  EN FP: driving down a country road
  tr FP: köy yolunda araba sürmek
2126 | spill (verb): to let liquid fall out of a container | loc: dökmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The kitten spilled the coffee!
  tr TS: Yavru kedi kahveyi döktü!
  EN FS: The kitten spilled the milk!
  tr FS: Yavru kedi sütü döktü!
  EN TP: spilled coffee on the table
  tr TP: masaya dökülmüş kahve
  EN FP: spilling paint on the floor
  tr FP: yere boya dökmek
2127 | table (noun): furniture with a flat top and legs | loc: masa
  EN TS: There is a book on the table.
  tr TS: Masada bir kitap var.
  EN FS: There is a cat on the table.
  tr FS: Masada bir kedi var.
  EN TP: a carved wooden table
  tr TP: oymalı ahşap bir masa
  EN FP: a table by the fire
  tr FP: şöminenin yanında bir masa
2128 | shoot (verb): to hit something with a missile from a weapon | loc: ateş etmek
  EN TS: He is shooting from a chariot!
  tr TS: Bir savaş arabasından ateş ediyor!
  EN FS: He is shooting from a boat!
  tr FS: Bir tekneden ateş ediyor!
  EN TP: shooting an arrow
  tr TP: ok atmak
  EN FP: shooting a photo
  tr FP: fotoğraf çekmek
2132 | abandoned (adjective): left empty and no longer used | loc: terk edilmiş
  EN TS: The library is abandoned.
  tr TS: Kütüphane terk edilmiş.
  EN FS: The school is abandoned.
  tr FS: Okul terk edilmiş.
  EN TP: an abandoned library
  tr TP: terk edilmiş bir kütüphane
  EN FP: an abandoned car
  tr FP: terk edilmiş bir araba
2133 | pillar (noun): a tall upright post of stone | loc: sütun
  EN TS: Stone pillars in the snow.
  tr TS: Karda taş sütunlar.
  EN FS: Stone pillars in the sand.
  tr FS: Kumda taş sütunlar.
  EN TP: pillars of stacked stones
  tr TP: üst üste taşlardan sütunlar
  EN FP: a pillar of a temple
  tr FP: bir tapınak sütunu
2134 | empress (noun): a woman who rules an empire | loc: imparatoriçe | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The empress is not amused.
  tr TS: İmparatoriçe hiç eğlenmiyor.
  EN FS: The empress is very amused.
  tr FS: İmparatoriçe çok eğleniyor.
  EN TP: a stern empress
  tr TP: sert bakışlı bir imparatoriçe
  EN FP: an empress on a horse
  tr FP: at üstünde bir imparatoriçe
2135 | swirl (noun): a curling, spiral shape | loc: kıvrım
  EN TS: This cat is made of swirls.
  tr TS: Bu kedi kıvrımlardan yapılmış.
  EN FS: This cat is made of squares.
  tr FS: Bu kedi karelerden yapılmış.
  EN TP: golden swirls
  tr TP: altın kıvrımlar
  EN FP: swirls of smoke
  tr FP: duman kıvrımları
2136 | glove (noun): a covering for your hand with fingers | loc: eldiven
  EN TS: The red gloves look great.
  tr TS: Kırmızı eldivenler harika duruyor.
  EN FS: The blue gloves look great.
  tr FS: Mavi eldivenler harika duruyor.
  EN TP: red space gloves
  tr TP: kırmızı uzay eldivenleri
  EN FP: red boxing gloves
  tr FP: kırmızı boks eldivenleri
2137 | halo (noun): a ring of light around a holy figure's head | loc: hale
  EN TS: Golden halo? Very stylish.
  tr TS: Altın hale mi? Çok şık.
  EN FS: Silver halo? Very stylish.
  tr FS: Gümüş hale mi? Çok şık.
  EN TP: a golden halo crown
  tr TP: taç gibi altın bir hale
  EN FP: a halo of dark smoke
  tr FP: kara dumandan bir hale
2139 | laser (noun): a narrow beam of strong light from a machine | loc: lazer
  EN TS: Laser beams glow behind her.
  tr TS: Arkasında lazer ışınları parlıyor.
  EN FS: Candles glow behind her.
  tr FS: Arkasında mumlar parlıyor.
  EN TP: neon laser beams
  tr TP: neon lazer ışınları
  EN FP: a laser pointer for cats
  tr FP: kediler için lazer işaretçi
2140 | machine (noun): a thing with moving metal parts built to work | loc: makine
  EN TS: This place is one big machine.
  tr TS: Burası koca bir makine.
  EN FS: This place is one big garden.
  tr FS: Burası koca bir bahçe.
  EN TP: a huge rusty machine
  tr TP: paslı, dev bir makine
  EN FP: a huge washing machine
  tr FP: dev bir çamaşır makinesi
2141 | basement (noun): a room below ground level in a building | loc: bodrum
  EN TS: Something is glowing in the basement.
  tr TS: Bodrumda bir şey parlıyor.
  EN FS: Something is burning in the basement.
  tr FS: Bodrumda bir şey yanıyor.
  EN TP: an open basement door
  tr TP: açık bir bodrum kapısı
  EN FP: a basement full of boxes
  tr FP: kutularla dolu bir bodrum
2143 | boulder (noun): a very large rounded rock | loc: kaya
  EN TS: Boulders stacked like Lego.
  tr TS: Kayalar Lego gibi üst üste dizilmiş.
  EN FS: Bricks stacked like Lego.
  tr FS: Tuğlalar Lego gibi üst üste dizilmiş.
  EN TP: a tower of boulders
  tr TP: kayalardan bir kule
  EN FP: a boulder rolling downhill
  tr FP: yokuştan yuvarlanan bir kaya
2144 | t-shirt (noun): a simple top with short sleeves and no collar | loc: tişört
  EN TS: She has a white t-shirt on.
  tr TS: Üstünde beyaz bir tişört var.
  EN FS: She has a black t-shirt on.
  tr FS: Üstünde siyah bir tişört var.
  EN TP: a white t-shirt and jacket
  tr TP: beyaz tişört ve ceket
  EN FP: a t-shirt on a hanger
  tr FP: askıda bir tişört
2146 | france (noun): the European country whose capital is Paris | loc: Fransa
  EN TS: France has a purple tower.
  tr TS: Fransa'nın mor bir kulesi var.
  EN FS: France has a green tower.
  tr FS: Fransa'nın yeşil bir kulesi var.
  EN TP: a tower in France
  tr TP: Fransa'da bir kule
  EN FP: a bridge in France
  tr FP: Fransa'da bir köprü
2149 | ridge (noun): the long top edge of a mountain or hill | loc: sırt
  EN TS: Ridge after ridge, all grey.
  tr TS: Sıra sıra sırtlar, hepsi gri.
  EN FS: Ridge after ridge, all green.
  tr FS: Sıra sıra sırtlar, hepsi yeşil.
  EN TP: rows of mountain ridges
  tr TP: sıra sıra dağ sırtları
  EN FP: a ridge covered in snow
  tr FP: karla kaplı bir sırt
2150 | ponytail (noun): hair tied back so it hangs like a tail | loc: at kuyruğu
  EN TS: Ponytail up. She will go out there.
  tr TS: Saçlar at kuyruğu. Oraya çıkacak.
  EN FS: Hair down. She will go out there.
  tr FS: Saçlar açık. Oraya çıkacak.
  EN TP: a ponytail at the window
  tr TP: pencere önünde bir at kuyruğu
  EN FP: a ponytail on a horse
  tr FP: bir atın kuyruğu
2151 | crescent (noun): the curved sliver shape of a moon | loc: hilal
  EN TS: The crescent moon is chilling.
  tr TS: Hilal kafa dinliyor.
  EN FS: The full moon is chilling.
  tr FS: Dolunay kafa dinliyor.
  EN TP: a crescent moon in clouds
  tr TP: bulutlarda bir hilal
  EN FP: a crescent moon at noon
  tr FP: öğlen vakti bir hilal
2152 | lipstick (noun): colour you paint on your lips | loc: ruj
  EN TS: Her lipstick is bright red.
  tr TS: Ruju parlak kırmızı.
  EN FS: Her lipstick is bright pink.
  tr FS: Ruju parlak pembe.
  EN TP: bright red lipstick
  tr TP: parlak kırmızı ruj
  EN FP: bright pink lipstick
  tr FP: parlak pembe ruj
2153 | china (noun): a very big country in East Asia | loc: Çin
  EN TS: China has a flying dragon!
  tr TS: Çin'in uçan bir ejderhası var!
  EN FS: China has a sleeping dragon!
  tr FS: Çin'in uyuyan bir ejderhası var!
  EN TP: a dragon from China
  tr TP: Çin'den bir ejderha
  EN FP: a tiger from China
  tr FP: Çin'den bir kaplan
2154 | general (noun): a top military commander who leads an army | loc: general
  EN TS: The general's beard is white.
  tr TS: Generalin sakalı beyaz.
  EN FS: The general's beard is black.
  tr FS: Generalin sakalı siyah.
  EN TP: an old general in armour
  tr TP: zırhlı, yaşlı bir general
  EN FP: a young general in armour
  tr FP: zırhlı, genç bir general
